Nevada, session 83, SB34.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 629A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
The PA Licensure Compact is hereby ratified and entered into
with all other jurisdictions legally joining the Compact, in
substantially the form set forth in this section:
PA LICENSURE COMPACT

SECTION 1. PURPOSE

In order to strengthen access to Medical Services, and in
recognition of the advances in the delivery of Medical Services,
the Participating States of the PA Licensure Compact have allied
in common purpose to develop a comprehensive process that
complements the existing authority of State Licensing Boards to
license and discipline PAs and seeks to enhance the portability of
a License to practice as a PA while safeguarding the safety of
patients. This Compact allows Medical Services to be provided by
-
*SB34*

– 5 –
PAs, via the mutual recognition of the Licensee’s Qualifying
License by other Compact Participating States. This Compact also
adopts the prevailing standard for PA licensure and affirms that
the practice and delivery of Medical Services by the PA occurs
where the patient is located at the time of the patient encounter,
and therefore requires the PA to be under the jurisdiction of the
State Licensing Board where the patient is located. State Licensing
Boards that participate in this Compact retain the jurisdiction to
impose Adverse Action against a Compact Privilege in that State
issued to a PA through the procedures of this Compact. The PA
Licensure Compact will alleviate burdens for military families by
allowing active duty military personnel and their spouses to obtain
a Compact Privilege based on having an unrestricted License in
good standing from a Participating State.

SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS

In this Compact:
A. “Adverse Action” means any administrative, civil,
equitable, or criminal action permitted by a State’s laws which is
imposed by a Licensing Board or other authority against a PA
License or License application or Compact Privilege such as
License denial, censure, revocation, suspension, probation,
monitoring of the Licensee, or restriction on the Licensee’s
practice.
B. “Compact Privilege” means the authorization granted by a
Remote State to allow a Licensee from another Participating State
to practice as a PA to provide Medical Services and other licensed
activity to a patient located in the Remote State under the Remote
State’s laws and regulations.
C. “Conviction” means a finding by a court that an
individual is guilty of a felony or misdemeanor offense through
adjudication or entry of a plea of guilt or no contest to the charge
by the offender.
D. “Criminal Background Check” means the submission of
fingerprints or other biometric-based information for a License
applicant for the purpose of obtaining that applicant’s criminal
history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d), from
the State’s criminal history record repository as defined in 28
C.F.R. § 20.3(f).
E. “Data System” means the repository of information about
Licensees, including but not limited to License status and Adverse
Actions, which is created and administered under the terms of this
Compact.
-
*SB34*

– 6 –
F. “Executive Committee” means a group of directors and
ex-officio individuals elected or appointed pursuant to
Section 7.F.2.
G. “Impaired Practitioner” means a PA whose practice is
adversely affected by health-related condition(s) that impact their
ability to practice.
H. “Investigative Information” means information, records,
or documents received or generated by a Licensing Board
pursuant to an investigation.
I. “Jurisprudence Requirement” means the assessment of an
individual’s knowledge of the laws and Rules governing the
practice of a PA in a State.
J. “License” means current authorization by a State, other
than authorization pursuant to a Compact Privilege, for a PA to
provide Medical Services, which would be unlawful without
current authorization.
K. “Licensee” means an individual who holds a License from
a State to provide Medical Services as a PA.
L. “Licensing Board” means any State entity authorized to
license and otherwise regulate PAs.
M. “Medical Services” means health care services provided
for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure or relief of a health
condition, injury, or disease, as defined by a State’s laws and
regulations.
N. “Model Compact” means the model for the PA Licensure
Compact on file with The Council of State Governments or other
entity as designated by the Commission.
O. “Participating State” means a State that has enacted this
Compact.
P. “PA” means an individual who is licensed as a physician
assistant in a State. For purposes of this Compact, any other title
or status adopted by a State to replace the term “physician
assistant” shall be deemed synonymous with “physician assistant”
and shall confer the same rights and responsibilities to the
Licensee under the provisions of this Compact at the time of its
enactment.
Q. “PA Licensure Compact Commission,” “Compact
Commission,” or “Commission” mean the national administrative
body created pursuant to Section 7.A of this Compact.
R. “Qualifying License” means an unrestricted License
issued by a Participating State to provide Medical Services as a
PA.
S. “Remote State” means a Participating State where a
Licensee who is not licensed as a PA is exercising or seeking to
exercise the Compact Privilege.
-
*SB34*

– 7 –
T. “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by an entity that
has the force and effect of law.
U. “Significant Investigative Information” means
Investigative Information that a Licensing Board, after an inquiry
or investigation that includes notification and an opportunity for
the PA to respond if required by State law, has reason to believe is
not groundless and, if proven true, would indicate more than a
minor infraction.
V. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or
territory of the United States.

SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THIS COMPACT

A. To participate in this Compact, a Participating State shall:
1. License PAs.
2. Participate in the Compact Commission’s Data System.
3. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and
investigating complaints against Licensees and License applicants.
4. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of
this Compact and Commission Rules, of any Adverse Action
against a Licensee or License applicant and the existence of
Significant Investigative Information regarding a Licensee or
License applicant.
5. Fully implement a Criminal Background Check
requirement, within a time frame established by Commission Rule,
by its Licensing Board receiving the results of a Criminal
Background Check and reporting to the Commission whether the
License applicant has been granted a License.
6. Comply with the Rules of the Compact Commission.
7. Utilize passage of a recognized national exam such as
the National Commission on Certification of Physician Assistants
(NCCPA) Physician Assistant National Certifying Examination
(PANCE) as a requirement for PA licensure.
8. Grant the Compact Privilege to a holder of a Qualifying
License in a Participating State.
B. Nothing in this Compact prohibits a Participating State
from charging a fee for granting the Compact Privilege.

SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE

A. To exercise the Compact Privilege, a Licensee must:
1. Have graduated from a PA program accredited by the
Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the Physician
Assistant, Inc. or other programs authorized by Commission Rule.
-
*SB34*

– 8 –
2. Hold current National Commission on Certification of
Physician Assistants (NCCPA) certification.
3. Have no felony or misdemeanor Conviction.
4. Have never had a controlled substance license, permit, or
registration suspended or revoked by a State or by the United
States Drug Enforcement Administration.
5. Have a unique identifier as determined by Commission
Rule.
6. Hold a Qualifying License.
7. Have had no revocation of a License or limitation or
restriction on any License currently held due to an adverse action.
8. If a Licensee has had a limitation or restriction on a
License or Compact Privilege due to an Adverse Action, two years
must have elapsed from the date on which the License or Compact
Privilege is no longer limited or restricted due to the Adverse
Action.
9. If a Compact Privilege has been revoked or is limited or
restricted in a Participating State for conduct that would not be a
basis for disciplinary action in a Participating State in which the
Licensee is practicing or applying to practice under a Compact
Privilege, that Participating State shall have the discretion not to
consider such action as an Adverse Action requiring the denial or
removal of a Compact Privilege in that State.
10. Notify the Compact Commission that the Licensee is
seeking the Compact Privilege in a Remote State.
11. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirement of a Remote State
in which the Licensee is seeking to practice under the Compact
Privilege and pay any fees applicable to satisfying the
Jurisprudence Requirement.
12. Report to the Commission any Adverse Action taken by
a non-participating State within thirty (30) days after the action is
taken.
B. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration or
revocation of the Qualifying License unless terminated pursuant
to an Adverse Action. The Licensee must also comply with all of
the requirements of Subsection A above to maintain the Compact
Privilege in a Remote State. If the Participating State takes
Adverse Action against a Qualifying License, the Licensee shall
lose the Compact Privilege in any Remote State in which the
Licensee has a Compact Privilege until all of the following occur:
1. The License is no longer limited or restricted; and
2. Two (2) years have elapsed from the date on which the
License is no longer limited or restricted due to the Adverse
Action.
-
*SB34*

– 9 –
C. Once a restricted or limited License satisfies the
requirements of Subsection B.1 and 2, the Licensee must meet the
requirements of Subsection A to obtain a Compact Privilege in any
Remote State.
D. For each Remote State in which a PA seeks authority to
prescribe controlled substances, the PA shall satisfy all
requirements imposed by such State in granting or renewing such
authority.

SECTION 5. DESIGNATION OF THE STATE FROM WHICH
LICENSEE IS APPLYING FOR A COMPACT PRIVILEGE

A. Upon a Licensee’s application for a Compact Privilege,
the Licensee shall identify to the Commission the Participating
State from which the Licensee is applying, in accordance with
applicable Rules adopted by the Commission, and subject to the
following requirements:
1. When applying for a Compact Privilege, the Licensee
shall provide the Commission with the address of the Licensee’s
primary residence and thereafter shall immediately report to the
Commission any change in the address of the Licensee’s primary
residence.
2. When applying for a Compact Privilege, the Licensee is
required to consent to accept service of process by mail at the
Licensee’s primary residence on file with the Commission with
respect to any action brought against the Licensee by the
Commission or a Participating State, including a subpoena, with
respect to any action brought or investigation conducted by the
Commission or a Participating State.

SECTION 6. ADVERSE ACTIONS

A. A Participating State in which a Licensee is licensed shall
have exclusive power to impose Adverse Action against the
Qualifying License issued by that Participating State.
B. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, a
Remote State shall have the authority, in accordance with existing
State due process law, to do all of the following:
1. Take Adverse Action against a PA’s Compact Privilege
within that State to remove a Licensee’s Compact Privilege or take
other action necessary under applicable law to protect the health
and safety of its citizens.
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations
that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as
the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a Licensing
-
*SB34*

– 10 –
Board in a Participating State for the attendance and testimony of
witnesses or the production of evidence from another Participating
State shall be enforced in the latter State by any court of
competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of
that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending
before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel
expenses, mileage and other fees required by the service statutes of
the State in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
3. Notwithstanding paragraph 2, subpoenas may not be
issued by a Participating State to gather evidence of conduct in
another State that is lawful in that other State for the purpose of
taking Adverse Action against a Licensee’s Compact Privilege or
application for a Compact Privilege in that Participating State.
4. Nothing in this Compact authorizes a Participating State
to impose discipline against a PA’s Compact Privilege or to deny
an application for a Compact Privilege in that Participating State
for the individual’s otherwise lawful practice in another State.
C. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Participating
State which issued the Qualifying License shall give the same
priority and effect to reported conduct received from any other
Participating State as it would if the conduct had occurred within
the Participating State which issued the Qualifying License. In so
doing, that Participating State shall apply its own State laws to
determine appropriate action.
D. A Participating State, if otherwise permitted by State law,
may recover from the affected PA the costs of investigations and
disposition of cases resulting from any Adverse Action taken
against that PA.
E. A Participating State may take Adverse Action based on
the factual findings of a Remote State, provided that the
Participating State follows its own procedures for taking the
Adverse Action.
F. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Participating
State by its respective State PA laws and regulations or other
applicable State law, any Participating State may participate with
other Participating States in joint investigations of Licensees.
2. Participating States shall share any investigative,
litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or
individual investigation initiated under this Compact.
G. If an Adverse Action is taken against a PA’s Qualifying
License, the PA’s Compact Privilege in all Remote States shall be
deactivated until two (2) years have elapsed after all restrictions
have been removed from the State License. All disciplinary orders
by the Participating State which issued the Qualifying License that
-
*SB34*

– 11 –
impose Adverse Action against a PA’s License shall include a
Statement that the PA’s Compact Privilege is deactivated in all
Participating States during the pendency of the order.
H. If any Participating State takes Adverse Action, it
promptly shall notify the administrator of the Data System.

SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE PA
LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION

A. The Participating States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency and national administrative body known as
the PA Licensure Compact Commission. The Commission is an
instrumentality of the Compact States acting jointly and not an
instrumentality of any one State. The Commission shall come into
existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth
in Section 11.A.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Participating State shall have and be limited to one
(1) delegate selected by that Participating State’s Licensing Board
or, if the State has more than one Licensing Board, selected
collectively by the Participating State’s Licensing Boards.
2. The delegate shall be either:
a. A current PA, physician or public member of a
Licensing Board or PA Council/Committee; or
b. An administrator of a Licensing Board.
3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office
as provided by the laws of the State from which the delegate is
appointed.
4. The Participating State Licensing Board shall fill any
vacancy occurring in the Commission within sixty (60) days.
5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote on all
matters voted on by the Commission and shall otherwise have an
opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the
Commission. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other
means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for
delegates’ participation in meetings by telecommunications, video
conference, or other means of communication.
6. The Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in this
Compact and the bylaws.
7. The Commission shall establish by Rule a term of office
for delegates.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers and
duties:
1. Establish a code of ethics for the Commission;
-
*SB34*

– 12 –
2. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
3. Establish fees;
4. Establish bylaws;
5. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the
bylaws;
6. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact and the bylaws;
7. Promulgate Rules to facilitate and coordinate
implementation and administration of this Compact. The Rules
shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all
Participating States;
8. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any State
Licensing Board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not
be affected;
9. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
10. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a Participating State;
11. Hire employees and engage contractors, elect or
appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such
individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this
Compact, and establish the Commission’s personnel policies and
programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of
personnel, and other related personnel matters;
12. Accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and receive,
utilize and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the
Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict
of interest;
13. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations
of, or otherwise own, hold, improve or use, any property, real,
personal or mixed; provided that at all times the Commission shall
avoid any appearance of impropriety;
14. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or
mixed;
15. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
16. Borrow money;
17. Appoint committees, including standing committees
composed of members, State regulators, State legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other
interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the
bylaws;
18. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
-
*SB34*

– 13 –
19. Elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer and
such other officers of the Commission as provided in the
Commission’s bylaws;
20. Reserve for itself, in addition to those reserved
exclusively to the Commission under the Compact, powers that the
Executive Committee may not exercise;
21. Approve or disapprove a State’s participation in
the Compact based upon its determination as to whether the
State’s Compact legislation departs in a material manner from the
Model Compact language;
22. Prepare and provide to the Participating States an
annual report; and
23. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact consistent
with the State regulation of PA licensure and practice.
D. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings of the Commission that are not closed
pursuant to this subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of
public meetings shall be posted on the Commission’s website at
least thirty (30) days prior to the public meeting.
2. Notwithstanding subsection D.1 of this section, the
Commission may convene a public meeting by providing at least
twenty-four (24) hours prior notice on the Commission’s website,
and any other means as provided in the Commission’s Rules, for
any of the reasons it may dispense with notice of proposed
rulemaking under Section 9.L.
3. The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public
meeting or non-public part of a public meeting to receive legal
advice or to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Participating State with its
obligations under this Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or
other matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel
practices and procedures;
c. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial
information that is privileged or confidential;
-
*SB34*

– 14 –
g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where
disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of
personal privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law
enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of information related to any investigative
reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission
or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to this Compact;
j. Legal advice; or
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or Participating States’ statutes.
4. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant
to this provision, the chair of the meeting or the chair’s designee
shall certify that the meeting or portion of the meeting may be
closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision.
5. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and
clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall
provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, including a
description of the views expressed. All documents considered in
connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All
minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under
seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the Commission or
order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
E. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment
of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and
ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate
revenue sources, donations, and grants of money, equipment,
supplies, materials, and services.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each Participating State and may impose
Compact Privilege fees on Licensees of Participating States to
whom a Compact Privilege is granted to cover the cost of the
operations and activities of the Commission and its staff, which
must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as
approved by the Commission each year for which revenue is not
provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment
amount levied on Participating States shall be allocated based
upon a formula to be determined by Commission Rule.
a. A Compact Privilege expires when the Licensee’s
Qualifying License in the Participating State from which the
Licensee applied for the Compact Privilege expires.
-
*SB34*

– 15 –
b. If the Licensee terminates the Qualifying License
through which the Licensee applied for the Compact Privilege
before its scheduled expiration, and the Licensee has a Qualifying
License in another Participating State, the Licensee shall inform
the Commission that it is changing to that Participating State the
Participating State through which it applies for a Compact
Privilege and pay to the Commission any Compact Privilege fee
required by Commission Rule.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall
the Commission pledge the credit of any of the Participating
States, except by and with the authority of the Participating State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the
Commission shall be subject to the financial review and
accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All receipts
and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be
subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed
public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be
included in and become part of the annual report of the
Commission.
F. The Executive Committee
1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on
behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact
and Commission Rules.
2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of nine (9)
members:
a. Seven voting members who are elected by the
Commission from the current membership of the Commission;
b. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized
national PA professional association; and
c. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized
national PA certification organization.
3. The ex-officio members will be selected by their
respective organizations.
4. The Commission may remove any member of the
Executive Committee as provided in its bylaws.
5. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
6. The Executive Committee shall have the following duties
and responsibilities:
a. Recommend to the Commission changes to the
Commission’s Rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact
legislation, fees to be paid by Compact Participating States such as
annual dues, and any Commission Compact fee charged to
Licensees for the Compact Privilege;
-
*SB34*

– 16 –
b. Ensure Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise;
c. Prepare and recommend the budget;
d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the
Commission;
e. Monitor Compact compliance of Participating States
and provide compliance reports to the Commission;
f. Establish additional committees as necessary;
g. Exercise the powers and duties of the Commission
during the interim between Commission meetings, except for
issuing proposed rulemaking or adopting Commission Rules or
bylaws, or exercising any other powers and duties exclusively
reserved to the Commission by the Commission’s Rules; and
h. Perform other duties as provided in the Commission’s
Rules or bylaws.
7. All meetings of the Executive Committee at which it votes
or plans to vote on matters in exercising the powers and duties of
the Commission shall be open to the public and public notice of
such meetings shall be given as public meetings of the
Commission are given.
8. The Executive Committee may convene in a closed, non-
public meeting for the same reasons that the Commission may
convene in a non-public meeting as set forth in Section 7.D 3 and
shall announce the closed meeting as the Commission is required
to under Section 7.D.4 and keep minutes of the closed meeting as
the Commission is required to under Section 7.D.5.
G. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any
claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other
civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any
damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement of
insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any way
compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the
Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising
out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred
-
*SB34*

– 17 –
within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or as determined by the commission that the
person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be
construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel
at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, and representative
of the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment
obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities,
provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not
result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
4. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against
the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court
of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses in any proceedings as authorized by
Commission Rules.
5. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any Licensee for professional malpractice or
misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other
applicable State laws.
6. Nothing herein shall be construed to designate the venue
or jurisdiction to bring actions for alleged acts of malpractice,
professional misconduct, negligence, or other such civil action
pertaining to the practice of a PA. All such matters shall be
determined exclusively by State law other than this Compact.
7. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Participating State’s state action immunity or
state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims
under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal
antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
8. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a
waiver of sovereign immunity by the Participating States or by the
Commission.
-
*SB34*

– 18 –
SECTION 8. DATA SYSTEM

A. The Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated data and
reporting system containing licensure, Adverse Action, and the
reporting of the existence of Significant Investigative Information
on all licensed PAs and applicants denied a License in
Participating States.
B. Notwithstanding any other State law to the contrary, a
Participating State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data
System on all PAs to whom this Compact is applicable (utilizing a
unique identifier) as required by the Rules of the Commission,
including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a License or Compact Privilege;
4. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for such denial (excluding the reporting of any Criminal history
record information where prohibited by law);
5. The existence of Significant Investigative Information;
and
6. Other information that may facilitate the administration
of this Compact, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
C. Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a
Licensee in any Participating State shall only be available to other
Participating States.
D. The Commission shall promptly notify all Participating
States of any Adverse Action taken against a Licensee or an
individual applying for a License that has been reported to it. This
Adverse Action information shall be available to any other
Participating State.
E. Participating States contributing information to the Data
System may, in accordance with State or federal law, designate
information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing State. Notwithstanding any
such designation, such information shall be reported to the
Commission through the Data System.
F. Any information submitted to the Data System that is
subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the
Participating State contributing the information shall be removed
from the Data System upon reporting of such by the Participating
State to the Commission.
G. The records and information provided to a Participating
State pursuant to this Compact or through the Data System, when
certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute
-
*SB34*

– 19 –
the authenticated business records of the Commission, and shall
be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant
judicial, quasi-judicial or administrative proceedings in a
Participating State.

SECTION 9. RULEMAKING

A. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Section and the Rules
adopted thereunder. Commission Rules shall become binding as of
the date specified by the Commission for each Rule.
B. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in
order to effectively and efficiently implement and administer this
Compact and achieve its purposes. A Commission Rule shall be
invalid and have not force or effect only if a court of competent
jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because the Commission
exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the
scope of the purposes of this Compact, or the powers granted
hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
C. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law
in each Participating State, provided however that where the Rules
of the Commission conflict with the laws of the Participating State
that establish the medical services a PA may perform in the
Participating State, as held by a court of competent jurisdiction,
the Rules of the Commission shall be ineffective in that State to
the extent of the conflict.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Participating States
rejects a Commission Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution
in the same manner used to adopt this Compact within four (4)
years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall
have no further force and effect in any Participating State or to
any State applying to participate in the Compact.
E. Commission Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special
meeting of the Commission.
F. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final Rule or
Rules by the Commission, and at least thirty (30) days in advance
of the meeting at which the Rule will be considered and voted
upon, the Commission shall file a Notice of Proposed
Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly
accessible platform; and
2. To persons who have requested notice of the
Commission’s notices of proposed rulemaking; and
3. In such other way(s) as the Commission may by Rule
specify.
-
*SB34*

– 20 –
G. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing on the
proposed Rule and the proposed time, date and location of the
meeting in which the proposed Rule will be considered and voted
upon;
2. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason for the
proposed Rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any
interested person and the date by which written comments must be
received; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit
notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the public
hearing or provide any written comments.
H. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission
shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, and
arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
I. If the hearing is to be held via electronic means, the
Commission shall publish the mechanism for access to the
electronic hearing.
1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall as
directed in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking, not less than five
(5) business days before the scheduled date of the hearing, notify
the Commission of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing.
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each
person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity
to comment orally or in writing.
3. All hearings shall be recorded. A copy of the recording
and the written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments
received in response to the proposed rulemaking shall be made
available to a person upon request.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each proposed Rule. Proposed Rules may be
grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings
required by this section.
J. Following the public hearing the Commission shall
consider all written and oral comments timely received.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all delegates,
take final action on the proposed Rule and shall determine the
effective date of the Rule, if adopted, based on the Rulemaking
record and the full text of the Rule.
1. If adopted, the Rule shall be posted on the Commission’s
website.
2. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed
Rule provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of
the proposed Rule.
-
*SB34*

– 21 –
3. The Commission shall provide on its website an
explanation of the reasons for substantive changes made to the
proposed Rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not
made that were recommended by commenters.
4. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective
date for the Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in
subsection L, the effective date of the Rule shall be no sooner than
thirty (30) days after the Commission issued the notice that it
adopted the Rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
Commission may consider and adopt an emergency Rule with
twenty-four (24) hours prior notice, without the opportunity for
comment, or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking
procedures provided in this Compact and in this section shall be
retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in
no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the
Rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one
that must be adopted immediately by the Commission in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State
funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Commission
Rule that is established by federal law or Rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the
Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted
Commission Rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors,
errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors.
Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any
person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision
may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
material change to a Rule. A challenge shall be made as set forth
in the notice of revisions and delivered to the Commission prior to
the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision
will take effect without further action. If the revision is
challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval
of the Commission.
N. No Participating State’s rulemaking requirements shall
apply under this Compact.
-
*SB34*

– 22 –
SECTION 10. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION,
AND ENFORCEMENT

A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches of State government
in each Participating State shall enforce this Compact and take all
actions necessary and appropriate to implement the Compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against
the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court
of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing
herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in
any action against a licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or
interpretation of the Compact or the Commission’s Rules and
shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all
purposes. Failure to provide the Commission with service of
process shall render a judgment or order in such proceeding void
as to the Commission, this Compact, or Commission Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a Participating State
has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or
responsibilities under this Compact or the Commission Rules, the
Commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting State
and other Participating States. The notice shall describe the
default, the proposed means of curing the default and any other
action that the Commission may take and shall offer remedial
training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
2. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the
defaulting State may be terminated from this Compact upon an
affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the Participating
States, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this
Compact upon such State may be terminated on the effective date
of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending
State of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of
default.
3. Termination of participation in this Compact shall be
imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have
been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be
given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and
-
*SB34*

– 23 –
minority leaders of the defaulting State’s legislature, and to the
Licensing Board(s) of each of the Participating States.
4. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the
effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
beyond the effective date of termination.
5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a
State that is found to be in default or that has been terminated
from this Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the
Commission and the defaulting State.
6. The defaulting State may appeal its termination from the
Compact by the Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court
for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing member shall
be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
attorney’s fees.
7. Upon the termination of a State’s participation in the
Compact, the State shall immediately provide notice to all
Licensees within that State of such termination:
a. Licensees who have been granted a Compact
Privilege in that State shall retain the Compact Privilege for one
hundred eighty (180) days following the effective date of such
termination.
b. Licensees who are licensed in that State who have
been granted a Compact Privilege in a Participating State shall
retain the Compact Privilege for one hundred eighty (180) days
unless the Licensee also has a Qualifying License in a
Participating State or obtains a Qualifying License in a
Participating State before the one hundred eighty (180)-day period
ends, in which case the Compact Privilege shall continue.
C. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Participating State, the Commission
shall attempt to resolve disputes related to this Compact that arise
among Participating States and between participating and non-
Participating States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as
appropriate.
D. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
discretion, shall enforce the provisions of this Compact and Rules
of the Commission.
2. If compliance is not secured after all means to secure
compliance have been exhausted, by majority vote, the
Commission may initiate legal action in the United States District
-
*SB34*

– 24 –
Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Commission has its principal offices, against a Participating State
in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of this
Compact and the Commission’s promulgated Rules and bylaws.
The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages.
In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party
shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
attorney’s fees.
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies
of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or State law.
E. Legal Action Against the Commission
1. A Participating State may initiate legal action against the
Commission in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia
or the federal district where the Commission has its principal
offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact
and its Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief
and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorney’s fees.
2. No person other than a Participating State shall enforce
this Compact against the Commission.

SECTION 11. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
PA LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION

A. This Compact shall come into effect on the date on which
this Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh
Participating State.
1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the
Commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of
the States that enacted the Compact prior to the Commission
convening (“Charter Participating States”) to determine if the
statute enacted by each such Charter Participating State is
materially different than the Model Compact.
a. A Charter Participating State whose enactment is
found to be materially different from the Model Compact shall be
entitled to the default process set forth in Section 10.B.
b. If any Participating State later withdraws from the
Compact or its participation is terminated, the Commission shall
remain in existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if
the number of Participating States should be less than seven.
Participating States enacting the Compact subsequent to the
Commission convening shall be subject to the process set forth in
Section 7.C.21 to determine if their enactments are materially
-
*SB34*

– 25 –
different from the Model Compact and whether they qualify for
participation in the Compact.
2. Participating States enacting the Compact subsequent to
the seven initial Charter Participating States shall be subject to the
process set forth in Section 7.C.21 to determine if their enactments
are materially different from the Model Compact and whether they
qualify for participation in the Compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact
prior to the effective date of the Compact or the Commission
coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the
Commission unless specifically repudiated by the Commission.
B. Any State that joins this Compact shall be subject to the
Commission’s Rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which
this Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been
previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force
and effect of law on the day this Compact becomes law in that
State.
C. Any Participating State may withdraw from this Compact
by enacting a statute repealing the same.
1. A Participating State’s withdrawal shall not take effect
until one hundred eighty (180) days after enactment of the
repealing statute. During this one hundred eighty (180) day-
period, all Compact Privileges that were in effect in the
withdrawing State and were granted to Licensees licensed in the
withdrawing State shall remain in effect. If any Licensee licensed
in the withdrawing State is also licensed in another Participating
State or obtains a license in another Participating State within the
one hundred eighty (180) days, the Licensee’s Compact Privileges
in other Participating States shall not be affected by the passage of
the one hundred eighty (180) days.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement
of the State Licensing Board(s) of the withdrawing State to comply
with the investigative, and Adverse Action reporting requirements
of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing a State
from this Compact, the State shall immediately provide notice of
such withdrawal to all Licensees within that State. Such
withdrawing State shall continue to recognize all licenses granted
pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty
(180) days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any PA licensure agreement or other
cooperative arrangement between Participating States and
-
*SB34*

– 26 –
between a Participating State and non-Participating State that
does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the Participating States.
No amendment to this Compact shall become effective and
binding upon any Participating State until it is enacted materially
in the same manner into the laws of all Participating States as
determined by the Commission.

SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

A. This Compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority
shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and
the implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions
of the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the
promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to limit the
Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if
any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact is held
by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the
constitution of any Participating State, a State seeking
participation in the Compact, or of the United States, or the
applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or
circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this
Compact and the applicability thereof to any other government,
agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B or this section, the
Commission may deny a State’s participation in the Compact or,
in accordance with the requirements of Section 10.B, terminate a
Participating State’s participation in the Compact, if it determines
that a constitutional requirement of a Participating State is, or
would be with respect to a State seeking to participate in the
Compact, a material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if
this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any
Participating State, the Compact shall remain in full force and
effect as to the remaining Participating States and in full force
and effect as to the Participating State affected as to all severable
matters.

SECTION 13. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT

A. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law
of a Participating State that is not inconsistent with this Compact.
B. Any laws in a Participating State in conflict with this
Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
-
*SB34*

– 27 –
C. All agreements between the Commission and the
Participating States are binding in accordance with their terms.
Sec. 2. NRS 629A.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629A.100 The Interstate Medical Licensure Compact is hereby
ratified and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining
the Compact, in substantially the form set forth in this [chapter:]
section:

INTERSTATE MEDICAL LICENSURE COMPACT

ARTICLE 1. PURPOSE

In order to strengthen access to health care, and in recognition of
the advances in the delivery of health care, the member states of the
Interstate Medical Licensure Compact have allied in common
purpose to develop a comprehensive process that complements the
existing licensing and regulatory authority of state medical boards
and provides a streamlined process which allows physicians to
become licensed in multiple states, thereby enhancing the portability
of a medical license and ensuring the safety of patients. The
Compact creates another pathway for licensure and does not
otherwise change a state’s existing Medical Practice Act. The
Compact also adopts the prevailing standard for licensure and
affirms that the practice of medicine occurs where the patient is
located at the time of the physician-patient encounter, and therefore,
requires the physician to be under the jurisdiction of the state
medical board where the patient is located. State medical boards that
participate in the Compact retain the jurisdiction to impose an
adverse action against a license to practice medicine in that state
issued to a physician through the procedures in the Compact.

ARTICLE 2. DEFINITIONS

In this Compact:
(a) “Bylaws” means those bylaws established by the Interstate
Commission pursuant to Article 11 for its governance, or for
directing and controlling its actions and conduct.
(b) “Commissioner” means the voting representative appointed
by each member board pursuant to Article 11.
(c) “Conviction” means a finding by a court that an individual is
guilty of a criminal offense through adjudication, or entry of a plea
of guilt or no contest to the charge by the offender. Evidence of an
entry of a conviction of a criminal offense by the court shall be
considered final for purposes of disciplinary action by a member
board.
-
*SB34*

– 28 –
(d) “Expedited license” means a full and unrestricted medical
license granted by a member state to an eligible physician through
the process set forth in the Compact.
(e) “Interstate Commission” means the Interstate Medical
Licensure Compact Commission created pursuant to Article 11.
(f) “License” means authorization by a state for a physician to
engage in the practice of medicine, which would be unlawful
without the authorization.
(g) “Medical Practice Act” means laws and regulations
governing the practice of allopathic and osteopathic medicine within
a member state.
(h) “Member board” means a state agency in a member state that
acts in the sovereign interests of the state by protecting the public
through licensure, regulation and education of physicians as directed
by the state government.
(i) “Member state” means a state that has enacted the Compact.
(j) “Practice of medicine” means the clinical prevention,
diagnosis or treatment of a human disease, injury or condition
requiring a physician to obtain and maintain a license in compliance
with the Medical Practice Act of a member state.
(k) “Physician” means any person who:
(1) Is a graduate of a medical school accredited by the
Liaison Committee on Medical Education, the Commission on
Osteopathic College Accreditation of the American Osteopathic
Association or a medical school listed in the International Medical
Education Directory or its equivalent;
(2) Has passed each component of the United States Medical
Licensing Examination (USMLE) or the Comprehensive
Osteopathic Medical Licensing Examination (COMLEX-USA)
within three attempts, or any of its predecessor examinations
accepted by a state medical board as an equivalent examination for
licensure purposes;
(3) Has successfully completed graduate medical education
approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical
Education or the American Osteopathic Association;
(4) Holds specialty certification or a time-unlimited specialty
certificate recognized by the American Board of Medical Specialties
or the American Osteopathic Association’s Bureau of Osteopathic
Specialists;
(5) Possesses a full and unrestricted license to engage in the
practice of medicine issued by a member board;
(6) Has never been convicted, received adjudication, deferred
adjudication, community supervision or deferred disposition for any
offense by a court of appropriate jurisdiction;
-
*SB34*

– 29 –
(7) Has never held a license authorizing the practice of
medicine subjected to discipline by a licensing agency in any state,
federal or foreign jurisdiction, excluding any action related to
nonpayment of fees related to a license;
(8) Has never had a controlled substance license or permit
suspended or revoked by a state or the United States Drug
Enforcement Administration; and
(9) Is not under active investigation by a licensing agency or
law enforcement authority in any state, federal or foreign
jurisdiction.
(l) “Offense” means a felony, gross misdemeanor or crime of
moral turpitude.
(m) “Rule” means a written statement by the Interstate
Commission promulgated pursuant to Article 12 of the Compact
that is of general applicability, implements, interprets or prescribes a
policy or provision of the Compact, or an organizational, procedural
or practice requirement of the Interstate Commission, and has the
force and effect of statutory law in a member state, and includes the
amendment, repeal or suspension of an existing rule.
(n) “State” means any state, commonwealth, district or territory
of the United States.
(o) “State of principal license” means a member state where a
physician holds a license to practice medicine and which has been
designated as such by the physician for purposes of registration and
participation in the Compact.

ARTICLE 3. ELIGIBILITY

(a) A physician must meet the eligibility requirements as
defined in Article 2(k) to receive an expedited license under the
terms and provisions of the Compact.
(b) A physician who does not meet the requirements of Article
2(k) may obtain a license to practice medicine in a member state if
the physician complies with all laws and requirements, other than
the Compact, relating to the issuance of a license to practice
medicine in that state.

ARTICLE 4. DESIGNATION OF STATE
OF PRINCIPAL LICENSE

(a) A physician shall designate a member state as the state of
principal license for purposes of registration for expedited licensure
through the Compact if the physician possesses a full and
unrestricted license to practice medicine in the state, and the state is:
(1) The state of primary residence for the physician;
-
*SB34*

– 30 –
(2) The state where at least 25 percent of the practice of
medicine occurs;
(3) The location of the physician’s employer; or
(4) If no state qualifies under paragraph (1), (2) or (3), the
state designated as the state of residence for the purpose of federal
income tax.
(b) A physician may redesignate a member state as the state of
principal license at any time, as long as the state meets the
requirements in subsection (a).
(c) The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules to
facilitate redesignation of another member state as the state of
principal license.

ARTICLE 5. APPLICATION AND ISSUANCE
OF EXPEDITED LICENSURE

(a) A physician seeking licensure through the Compact shall file
an application for an expedited license with the member board of the
state selected by the physician as the state of principal license.
(b) Upon receipt of an application for an expedited license, the
member board within the state selected as the state of principal
license shall evaluate whether the physician is eligible for expedited
licensure and issue a letter of qualification, verifying or denying the
physician’s eligibility, to the Interstate Commission. For purposes of
this subsection:
(1) Static qualifications, which include verification of
medical education, graduate medical education, results of any
medical or licensing examination and other qualifications as
determined by the Interstate Commission through rule, shall not be
subject to additional primary source verification where the primary
source has already been verified by the state of principal license.
(2) The member board within the state selected as the state of
principal license shall, in the course of verifying eligibility, perform
a criminal background check of an applicant, including the use of
the results of fingerprint or other biometric data checks compliant
with the requirements of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, with
the exception of federal employees who have a suitability
determination in accordance with 5 C.F.R. § 731.202.
(3) Appeal on the determination of eligibility shall be made
to the member state where the application was filed and shall be
subject to the law of that state.
(c) Upon verification in subsection (b), physicians eligible for an
expedited license shall complete the registration process established
by the Interstate Commission to receive a license in a member state
-
*SB34*

– 31 –
selected pursuant to subsection (a), including the payment of any
applicable fees.
(d) After receiving verification of eligibility under subsection
(b) and any fees under subsection (c), a member board shall issue an
expedited license to the physician. This license shall authorize the
physician to practice medicine in the issuing state consistent with
the Medical Practice Act and all applicable laws and regulations of
the issuing member board and member state.
(e) An expedited license shall be valid for a period consistent
with the licensure period in the member state and in the same
manner as required for other physicians holding a full and
unrestricted license within the member state.
(f) An expedited license obtained through the Compact shall be
terminated if a physician fails to maintain a license in the state of
principal licensure for a nondisciplinary reason, without
redesignation of a new state of principal licensure.
(g) The Board of Medical Examiners and the State Board of
Osteopathic Medicine, in conjunction with the Interstate
Commission, are authorized to develop rules regarding the
application process, including payment of any applicable fees and
the issuance of an expedited license.

ARTICLE 6. FEES FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE

(a) A member state issuing an expedited license authorizing the
practice of medicine in that state may impose a fee for a license
issued or renewed through the Compact.
(b) The Board of Medical Examiners and the State Board of
Osteopathic Medicine, in conjunction with the Interstate
Commission, are authorized to develop rules regarding fees for
expedited licenses.

ARTICLE 7. RENEWAL AND CONTINUED
PARTICIPATION

(a) A physician seeking to renew an expedited license granted in
a member state shall complete a renewal process with the Board of
Medical Examiners or the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine, as
applicable, in conjunction with the Interstate Commission, if the
physician:
(1) Maintains a full and unrestricted license in a state of
principal license;
(2) Has not been convicted, received adjudication, deferred
adjudication, community supervision or deferred disposition for any
offense by a court of appropriate jurisdiction;
-
*SB34*

– 32 –
(3) Has not had a license authorizing the practice of medicine
subject to discipline by a licensing agency in any state, federal or
foreign jurisdiction, excluding any action related to nonpayment of
fees related to a license; and
(4) Has not had a controlled substance license or permit
suspended or revoked by a state or the United States Drug
Enforcement Administration.
(b) Physicians shall comply with all continuing professional
development or continuing medical education requirements for
renewal of a license issued by a member state.
(c) The Board of Medical Examiners and the State Board of
Osteopathic Medicine, as applicable, shall collect any renewal fees
charged for the renewal of a license and distribute the fees to the
Interstate Commission.
(d) Subject to the renewal requirements in this Article and those
specific to license renewal by the Board of Medical Examiners or
the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine, as applicable, and upon
receipt of any renewal fees collected in subsection (c), a member
board shall renew the physician’s license.
(e) Physician information collected by the Interstate
Commission during the renewal process will be distributed to all
member boards.
(f) The Board of Medical Examiners and the State Board of
Osteopathic Medicine, in conjunction with the Interstate
Commission, are authorized to develop rules to address renewal of
licenses obtained through the Compact.

ARTICLE 8. COORDINATED INFORMATION SYSTEM

(a) The Interstate Commission shall establish a database of all
physicians licensed, or who have applied for licensure, pursuant to
Article 5.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, member boards
shall report to the Interstate Commission any public action or
complaints against a licensed physician who has applied for or
received an expedited license through the Compact.
(c) Member boards shall report disciplinary or investigatory
information determined as necessary and proper by rule of the
Interstate Commission.
(d) Member boards may report any nonpublic complaint,
disciplinary or investigatory information not required by subsection
(c) to the Interstate Commission.
(e) Member boards shall share complaint or disciplinary
information about a physician upon request of another member
board.
-
*SB34*

– 33 –
(f) All information provided to the Interstate Commission or
distributed by member boards shall be confidential, filed under seal
and used only for investigatory or disciplinary matters.
(g) The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules for
mandatory or discretionary sharing of information by member
boards.

ARTICLE 9. JOINT INVESTIGATIONS

(a) Licensure and disciplinary records of physicians are deemed
investigative.
(b) In addition to the authority granted to a member board by its
respective Medical Practice Act or other applicable state law, a
member board may participate with other member boards in joint
investigations of physicians licensed by the member boards.
(c) A subpoena issued by a member state shall be enforceable in
other member states.
(d) Member boards may share any investigative, litigation or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual
investigation initiated under the Compact.
(e) Any member state may investigate actual or alleged
violations of the statutes authorizing the practice of medicine in any
other member state in which a physician holds a license to practice
medicine.

ARTICLE 10. DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS

(a) Any disciplinary action taken by any member board against a
physician licensed through the Compact shall be deemed
unprofessional conduct which may be subject to discipline by other
member boards, in addition to any violation of the Medical Practice
Act or regulations in that state.
(b) If a license granted to a physician by the member board in
the state of principal license is revoked, surrendered or relinquished
in lieu of discipline, or suspended, then all licenses issued to the
physician by member boards shall automatically be placed, without
further action necessary by any member board, on the same status. If
the member board in the state of principal license subsequently
reinstates the physician’s license, a license issued to the physician
by any other member board shall remain encumbered until that
respective member board takes action to reinstate the license in a
manner consistent with the Medical Practice Act of that state.
(c) If disciplinary action is taken against a physician by a
member board not in the state of principal license, any other
-
*SB34*

– 34 –
member board may deem the action conclusive as to matter of law
and fact decided, and:
(1) Impose the same or lesser sanctions against the physician
so long as such sanctions are consistent with the Medical Practice
Act of that state; or
(2) Pursue separate disciplinary action against the physician
under its respective Medical Practice Act, regardless of the action
taken in other member states.
(d) If a license granted to a physician by a member board is
revoked, surrendered or relinquished in lieu of discipline, or
suspended, then any license issued to the physician by any other
member board shall be suspended, automatically and immediately
without further action necessary by the other member board, for 90
days upon entry of the order by the disciplining board, to permit the
member board to investigate the basis for the action under the
Medical Practice Act of that state. A member board may terminate
the automatic suspension of the license it issued prior to the
completion of the 90 day suspension period in a manner consistent
with the Medical Practice Act of that state.

ARTICLE 11. INTERSTATE MEDICAL
LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION

(a) The member states hereby create the “Interstate Medical
Licensure Compact Commission.”
(b) The purpose of the Interstate Commission is the
administration of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact, which
is a discretionary state function.
(c) The Interstate Commission shall be a body corporate and
joint agency of the member states and shall have all the
responsibilities, powers and duties set forth in the Compact, and
such additional powers as may be conferred upon it by a subsequent
concurrent action of the respective legislatures of the member states
in accordance with the terms of the Compact.
(d) The Interstate Commission shall consist of two voting
representatives appointed by each member state who shall serve as
Commissioners. In states where allopathic and osteopathic
physicians are regulated by separate member boards, or if the
licensing and disciplinary authority is split between multiple
member boards within a member state, the member state shall
appoint one representative from each member board. A
Commissioner shall be:
(1) An allopathic or osteopathic physician appointed to a
member board;
-
*SB34*

– 35 –
(2) An executive director, executive secretary or similar
executive of a member board; or
(3) A member of the public appointed to a member board.
(e) The Interstate Commission shall meet at least once each
calendar year. A portion of this meeting shall be a business meeting
to address such matters as may properly come before the
Commission, including the election of officers. The Chairperson
may call additional meetings and shall call for a meeting upon the
request of a majority of the member states.
(f) The bylaws may provide for meetings of the Interstate
Commission to be conducted by telecommunication or electronic
communication.
(g) Each Commissioner participating at a meeting of the
Interstate Commission is entitled to one vote. A majority of
Commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business, unless a larger quorum is required by the bylaws of the
Interstate Commission. A Commissioner shall not delegate a vote to
another Commissioner. In the absence of its Commissioner, a
member state may delegate voting authority for a specified meeting
to another person from that state who meets the requirements of
subsection (d).
(h) The Interstate Commission shall provide public notice of all
meetings, and all meetings must be open to the public. The Interstate
Commission may close a meeting, in full or in portion, where it
determines by a two-thirds vote of the Commissioners present that
an open meeting would be likely to:
(1) Relate solely to the internal personnel practices and
procedures of the Interstate Commission;
(2) Discuss matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
a federal statute;
(3) Discuss trade secrets, commercial or financial
information that is privileged or confidential;
(4) Involve accusing a person of a crime or formally
censuring a person;
(5) Discuss information of a personal nature where
disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of
personal privacy;
(6) Discuss investigative records compiled for law
enforcement purposes; or
(7) Specifically relate to the participation in a civil action or
other legal proceeding.
(i) The Interstate Commission shall keep minutes which shall
fully describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a
full and accurate summary of actions taken, including a record of
any roll call votes.
-
*SB34*

– 36 –
(j) The Interstate Commission shall make its information and
official records, to the extent not otherwise designated in the
Compact or by its rules, available to the public for inspection.
(k) The Interstate Commission shall establish an Executive
Committee, which must include officers, members and others as
determined by the bylaws. The Executive Committee shall have the
power to act on behalf of the Interstate Commission, with the
exception of rulemaking, during periods when the Interstate
Commission is not in session. When acting on behalf of the
Interstate Commission, the Executive Committee shall oversee the
administration of the Compact, including enforcement and
compliance with the provisions of the Compact, its bylaws and rules
and other such duties as necessary.
(l) The Interstate Commission may establish other committees
for governance and administration of the Compact.

ARTICLE 12. POWERS AND DUTIES
OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

The Interstate Commission shall have the duty and power to:
(a) Oversee and maintain the administration of the Compact;
(b) Promulgate rules which shall be binding to the extent and in
the manner provided for in the Compact;
(c) Issue, upon the request of a member state or member board,
advisory opinions concerning the meaning or interpretation of the
Compact, its bylaws, rules and actions;
(d) Enforce compliance with Compact provisions, the rules
promulgated by the Interstate Commission and the bylaws, using all
necessary and proper means, including, but not limited to, the use of
judicial process;
(e) Establish and appoint committees, including, but not limited
to, an Executive Committee as required by Article 11, which shall
have the power to act on behalf of the Interstate Commission in
carrying out its powers and duties;
(f) Pay, or provide for the payment of, the expenses related to
the establishment, organization and ongoing activities of the
Interstate Commission;
(g) Establish and maintain one or more offices;
(h) Borrow, accept, hire or contract for services of personnel;
(i) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(j) Employ an Executive Director who shall have such powers to
employ, select or appoint employees, agents or consultants, and to
determine their qualifications, define their duties and fix their
compensation;
-
*SB34*

– 37 –
(k) Establish personnel policies and programs relating to
conflicts of interest, rates of compensation and qualifications of
personnel;
(l) Accept donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies,
materials and services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of it in a
manner consistent with the conflict of interest policies established
by the Interstate Commission;
(m) Lease, purchase, accept contributions or donations of, or
otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, real, personal
or mixed;
(n) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or
otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal or mixed;
(o) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(p) Adopt a seal and bylaws governing the management and
operation of the Interstate Commission;
(q) Report annually to the legislatures and governors of the
member states concerning the activities of the Interstate
Commission during the preceding year. Such reports shall also
include reports of financial audits and any recommendations that
may have been adopted by the Interstate Commission;
(r) Coordinate education, training and public awareness
regarding the Compact, its implementation and its operation;
(s) Maintain records in accordance with the bylaws;
(t) Seek and obtain trademarks, copyrights and patents; and
(u) Perform such functions as may be necessary or appropriate
to achieve the purposes of the Compact.

ARTICLE 13. FINANCE POWERS

(a) The Interstate Commission may levy on and collect an
annual assessment from each member state to cover the cost of the
operations and activities of the Interstate Commission and its staff.
The total assessment must be sufficient to cover the annual budget
approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other
sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated
upon a formula to be determined by the Interstate Commission,
which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.
(b) The Interstate Commission shall not incur obligations of any
kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same.
(c) The Interstate Commission shall not pledge the credit of any
of the member states, except by, and with the authority of, the
member state.
(d) The Interstate Commission shall be subject to a yearly
financial audit conducted by a certified or licensed public
-
*SB34*

– 38 –
accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in the annual
report of the Interstate Commission.

ARTICLE 14. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION
OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

(a) The Interstate Commission shall, by a majority of
Commissioners present and voting, adopt bylaws to govern its
conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the
purposes of the Compact within 12 months of the first Interstate
Commission meeting.
(b) The Interstate Commission shall elect or appoint annually
from among its Commissioners a Chairperson, a Vice Chairperson
and a Treasurer, each of whom shall have such authority and duties
as may be specified in the bylaws. The Chairperson, or in the
Chairperson’s absence or disability, the Vice Chairperson, shall
preside at all meetings of the Interstate Commission.
(c) Officers selected in subsection (b) shall serve without
remuneration from the Interstate Commission.
(d) The officers and employees of the Interstate Commission
shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their
official capacity, for a claim for damage to or loss of property or
personal injury or other civil liability caused or arising out of, or
relating to, an actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred,
or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred,
within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities, provided that such person shall not be protected
from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury or liability caused by
the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person. For
purposes of this subsection:
(1) The liability of the Executive Director and employees of
the Interstate Commission or representatives of the Interstate
Commission, acting within the scope of such person’s employment
or duties for acts, errors or omissions occurring within such person’s
state, may not exceed the limits of liability set forth under the
constitution and laws of that state for state officials, employees and
agents. The Interstate Commission is considered to be an
instrumentality of the states for the purposes of any such action.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect such person
from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury or liability caused by
the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person.
(2) The Interstate Commission shall defend the Executive
Director, its employees and, subject to the approval of the attorney
general or other appropriate legal counsel of the member state
represented by an Interstate Commission representative, such
-
*SB34*

– 39 –
Interstate Commission representative in any civil action seeking to
impose liability arising out of an actual or alleged act, error or
omission that occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the defendant had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Interstate
Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that
the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from
intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on the part of such
person.
(3) To the extent not covered by the state involved, the
member state or the Interstate Commission, the representatives or
employees of the Interstate Commission shall be held harmless in
the amount of a settlement or judgment, including attorney’s fees
and costs, obtained against such persons arising out of an actual or
alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of
Interstate Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or
that such persons had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error or
omission did not result from intentional or willful and wanton
misconduct on the part of such persons.

ARTICLE 15. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS
OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

(a) The Interstate Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules
in order to effectively and efficiently achieve the purposes of the
Compact. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the Interstate
Commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is
beyond the scope of the purposes of the Compact, or the powers
granted hereunder, then such an action by the Interstate Commission
shall be invalid and have no force or effect.
(b) Rules deemed appropriate for the operations of the Interstate
Commission shall be made pursuant to a rulemaking process that
substantially conforms to the Model State Administrative Procedure
Act of 2010, and subsequent amendments thereto.
(c) Not later than 30 days after a rule is promulgated, any person
may file a petition for judicial review of the rule in the United States
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the Interstate Commission has its principal offices, provided
that the filing of such a petition shall not stay or otherwise prevent
the rule from becoming effective unless the court finds that the
petitioner has a substantial likelihood of success. The court shall
give deference to the actions of the Interstate Commission consistent
with applicable law and shall not find the rule to be unlawful if the
-
*SB34*

– 40 –
rule represents a reasonable exercise of the authority granted to the
Interstate Commission.

ARTICLE 16. OVERSIGHT OF INTERSTATE COMPACT

(a) The executive, legislative and judicial branches of state
government in each member state shall enforce the Compact and
shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the
Compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of the Compact and
the rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law
but shall not override existing state authority to regulate the practice
of medicine.
(b) All courts shall take judicial notice of the Compact and the
rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state
pertaining to the subject matter of the Compact which may affect the
powers, responsibilities or actions of the Interstate Commission.
(c) The Interstate Commission shall be entitled to receive all
service of process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing
to intervene in the proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide
service of process to the Interstate Commission shall render a
judgment or order void as to the Interstate Commission, the
Compact or promulgated rules.

ARTICLE 17. ENFORCEMENT OF INTERSTATE COMPACT

(a) The Interstate Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of the Compact.
(b) The Interstate Commission may, by majority vote of the
Commissioners, initiate legal action in the United States District
Court for the District of Columbia or, at the discretion of the
Interstate Commission, in the federal district where the Interstate
Commission has its principal offices, to enforce compliance with the
provisions of the Compact, and its promulgated rules and bylaws,
against a member state in default. The relief sought may include
both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
(c) The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of
the Interstate Commission. The Interstate Commission may avail
itself of any other remedies available under state law or the
regulation of a profession.
-
*SB34*

– 41 –
ARTICLE 18. DEFAULT PROCEDURES

(a) The grounds for default include, but are not limited to,
failure of a member state to perform such obligations or
responsibilities imposed upon it by the Compact, or the rules and
bylaws of the Interstate Commission promulgated under the
Compact.
(b) If the Interstate Commission determines that a member state
has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities
under the Compact, or the bylaws or promulgated rules, the
Interstate Commission shall:
(1) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other
member states of the nature of the default, the means of curing the
default and any action taken by the Interstate Commission. The
Interstate Commission shall specify the conditions by which the
defaulting state must cure its default; and
(2) Provide remedial training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
(c) If the defaulting state fails to cure the default, the defaulting
state shall be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote
of a majority of the Commissioners and all rights, privileges and
benefits conferred by the Compact shall terminate on the effective
date of the termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the
offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period
of the default.
(d) Termination of membership in the Compact shall be
imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have
been exhausted. Notice of intent to terminate shall be given by the
Interstate Commission to the governor, the majority and minority
leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature and each of the member
states.
(e) The Interstate Commission shall establish rules and
procedures to address licenses and physicians that are materially
impacted by the termination of a member state, or the withdrawal of
a member state.
(f) The member state which has been terminated is responsible
for all dues, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective
date of the termination, including obligations the performance of
which extends beyond the effective date of the termination.
(g) The Interstate Commission shall not bear any costs relating
to any state that has been found to be in default or which has been
terminated from the Compact, unless otherwise mutually agreed
upon in writing between the Interstate Commission and the
defaulting state.
-
*SB34*

– 42 –
(h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Interstate
Commission by petitioning the United States District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the Interstate
Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s
fees.

ARTICLE 19. DISPUTE RESOLUTION

(a) The Interstate Commission shall attempt, upon the request of
a member state, to resolve disputes which are subject to the
Compact and which may arise among member states or member
boards.
(b) The Interstate Commission shall promulgate rules providing
for both mediation and binding dispute resolution as appropriate.

ARTICLE 20. MEMBER STATES, EFFECTIVE
DATE AND AMENDMENT

(a) Any state is eligible to become a member state of the
Compact.
(b) The Compact shall become effective and binding upon
legislative enactment of the Compact into law by no less than seven
states. Thereafter, it shall become effective and binding on a state
upon enactment of the Compact into law by that state.
(c) The governors of nonmember states, or their designees, shall
be invited to participate in the activities of the Interstate
Commission on a nonvoting basis prior to adoption of the Compact
by all states.
(d) The Interstate Commission may propose amendments to the
Compact for enactment by the member states. No amendment shall
become effective and binding upon the Interstate Commission and
the member states unless and until it is enacted into law by
unanimous consent of the member states.

ARTICLE 21. WITHDRAWAL

(a) Once effective, the Compact shall continue in force and
remain binding upon each and every member state, provided that a
member state may withdraw from the Compact by specifically
repealing the statute which enacted the Compact into law.
(b) Withdrawal from the Compact shall be by the enactment of a
statute repealing the same, but shall not take effect until 1 year after
the effective date of such statute and until written notice of the
-
*SB34*

– 43 –
withdrawal has been given by the withdrawing state to the governor
of each other member state.
(c) The withdrawing state shall immediately notify the
Chairperson of the Interstate Commission in writing upon the
introduction of legislation repealing the Compact in the withdrawing
state.
(d) The Interstate Commission shall notify the other member
states of the withdrawing state’s intent to withdraw within 60 days
of its receipt of notice provided under subsection (c).
(e) The withdrawing state is responsible for all dues, obligations
and liabilities incurred through the effective date of the withdrawal,
including obligations, the performance of which extends beyond the
effective date of the withdrawal.
(f) Reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state shall
occur upon the withdrawing state reenacting the Compact or upon
such later date as determined by the Interstate Commission.
(g) The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules to
address the impact of the withdrawal of a member state on licenses
granted in other member states to physicians who designated the
withdrawing member state as the state of principal license.

ARTICLE 22. DISSOLUTION

(a) The Compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the
withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces the
membership in the Compact to one member state.
(b) Upon the dissolution of the Compact, the Compact becomes
null and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the
business and affairs of the Interstate Commission shall be concluded
and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the bylaws.

ARTICLE 23. SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION

(a) The provisions of the Compact shall be severable, and if any
phrase, clause, sentence or provision is deemed unenforceable, the
remaining provisions of the Compact shall be enforceable.
(b) The provisions of the Compact shall be liberally construed to
effectuate its purposes.
(c) Nothing in the Compact shall be construed to prohibit the
applicability of other interstate compacts to which the states are
members.
-
*SB34*

– 44 –
ARTICLE 24. BINDING EFFECT OF
COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

(a) Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of
a member state that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
(b) All laws in a member state in conflict with the Compact are
superseded to the extent of the conflict.
(c) All lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all
rules and bylaws promulgated by the Commission, are binding upon
the member states.
(d) All agreements between the Interstate Commission and the
member states are binding in accordance with their terms.
(e) In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the
constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state,
such provisions shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with
the constitutional provision in question in that member state.
Sec. 3. Chapter 630 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 4 and 5 of this act.
Sec. 4. “PA Licensure Compact” means the PA Licensure
Compact ratified and entered into in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 5. 1. The Board shall perform all duties imposed on
this State by the PA Licensure Compact with respect to a physician
assistant who is licensed pursuant to this chapter.
2. The Board has jurisdiction over a physician assistant who
is practicing in this State under a compact privilege pursuant to
the PA Licensure Compact if the physician assistant:
(a) Is licensed by a professional licensing board or other
governmental entity in another jurisdiction that licenses allopathic
physician assistants and does not license osteopathic physician
assistants; or
(b) Received his or her education as a physician assistant
primarily in allopathic techniques and is licensed by a
professional licensing board or other governmental entity in
another jurisdiction that licenses both allopathic and osteopathic
physician assistants.
Sec. 6. NRS 630.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.005 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 630.007 to 630.026,
inclusive, and section 4 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 7. NRS 630.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.015 “Physician assistant” means a person who is [a] :
1. A graduate of an academic program approved by the Board
or who, by general education, practical training and experience
determined to be satisfactory by the Board, is qualified to perform
-
*SB34*

– 45 –
medical services under the supervision of a supervising physician
and who has been issued a license by the Board [.] ; or
2. Practicing in this State under a compact privilege pursuant
to the PA Licensure Compact and is under the jurisdiction of the
Board pursuant to section 5 of this act.
Sec. 8. NRS 630.30665 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.30665 1. The Board shall require each holder of a license
to practice medicine to submit to the Board, on a form provided by
the Board, a report stating the number and type of surgeries
requiring conscious sedation, deep sedation or general anesthesia
performed by the holder of the license at his or her office or any
other facility, excluding any surgical care performed:
(a) At a medical facility as that term is defined in NRS
449.0151; or
(b) Outside of this State.
2. The Board shall require each holder of a license to practice
medicine to submit a report to the Board concerning the occurrence
of any sentinel event arising from any surgery described in
subsection 1 within 14 days after the occurrence of the sentinel
event. The report must be submitted in the manner prescribed by the
Board.
3. The Board shall:
(a) Collect and maintain reports received pursuant to subsections
1 and 2; and
(b) Ensure that the reports, and any additional documents
created from the reports, are protected adequately from fire, theft,
loss, destruction and other hazards, and from unauthorized access.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115 [,] and
section 1 of this act, a report received pursuant to subsection 1 or 2
is confidential, not subject to subpoena or discovery, and not subject
to inspection by the general public.
5. The provisions of this section do not apply to surgical care
requiring only the administration of oral medication to a patient to
relieve the patient’s anxiety or pain, if the medication is not given in
a dosage that is sufficient to induce in a patient a controlled state of
depressed consciousness or unconsciousness similar to general
anesthesia, deep sedation or conscious sedation.
6. In addition to any other remedy or penalty, if a holder of a
license to practice medicine fails to submit a report or knowingly or
willfully files false information in a report submitted pursuant to this
section, the Board may, after providing the holder of a license to
practice medicine with notice and opportunity for a hearing, impose
against the holder of a license to practice medicine an administrative
penalty for each such violation. The Board shall establish by
regulation a sliding scale based on the severity of the violation to
-
*SB34*

– 46 –
determine the amount of the administrative penalty to be imposed
against the holder of the license pursuant to this subsection. The
regulations must include standards for determining the severity of
the violation and may provide for a more severe penalty for multiple
violations.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Conscious sedation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.436.
(b) “Deep sedation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.437.
(c) “General anesthesia” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.438.
(d) “Sentinel event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 439.830.
Sec. 9. NRS 630.336 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.336 1. Any deliberations conducted or vote taken by the
Board or any investigative committee of the Board regarding its
ordering of a physician, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care to
undergo a physical or mental examination or any other examination
designated to assist the Board or committee in determining the
fitness of a physician, perfusionist, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant or practitioner of respiratory care are not
subject to the requirements of NRS 241.020.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or 4, all
applications for a license to practice medicine, perfusion or
respiratory care, any charges filed by the Board, financial records of
the Board, formal hearings on any charges heard by the Board or a
panel selected by the Board, records of such hearings and any order
or decision of the Board or panel must be open to the public.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115 [,] and
section 1 of this act, the following may be kept confidential:
(a) Any statement, evidence, credential or other proof submitted
in support of or to verify the contents of an application;
(b) Any report concerning the fitness of any person to receive or
hold a license to practice medicine, perfusion or respiratory care;
and
(c) Any communication between:
(1) The Board and any of its committees or panels; and
(2) The Board or its staff, investigators, experts, committees,
panels, hearing officers, advisory members or consultants and
counsel for the Board.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and NRS
239.0115 [,] and section 1 of this act, a complaint filed with the
Board pursuant to NRS 630.307, all documents and other
-
*SB34*

– 47 –
information filed with the complaint and all documents and other
information compiled as a result of an investigation conducted to
determine whether to initiate disciplinary action are confidential.
5. The formal complaint or other document filed by the Board
to initiate disciplinary action and all documents and information
considered by the Board when determining whether to impose
discipline are public records.
6. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
any other licensing board or agency or any agency which is
investigating a person, including a law enforcement agency. Such
cooperation may include, without limitation, providing the board or
agency with minutes of a closed meeting, transcripts of oral
examinations and the results of oral examinations.
Sec. 10. Chapter 632 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Nurse Licensure Compact is hereby ratified and entered
into with all other jurisdictions legally joining the Compact, in the
form substantially as follows:

NURSE LICENSURE COMPACT

ARTICLE I.

FINDINGS AND DECLARATION OF PURPOSE

a. The party states find that:
1. The health and safety of the public are affected by the
degree of compliance with and the effectiveness of enforcement
activities related to state nurse licensure laws;
2. Violations of nurse licensure and other laws regulating
the practice of nursing may result in injury or harm to the public;
3. The expanded mobility of nurses and the use of
advanced communication technologies as part of our nation’s
health care delivery system require greater coordination and
cooperation among states in the areas of nurse licensure and
regulation;
4. New practice modalities and technology make
compliance with individual state nurse licensure laws difficult and
complex;
5. The current system of duplicative licensure for nurses
practicing in multiple states is cumbersome and redundant for
both nurses and states; and
6. Uniformity of nurse licensure requirements throughout
the states promotes public safety and public health benefits.
-
*SB34*

– 48 –
b. The general purposes of this Compact are to:
1. Facilitate the states’ responsibility to protect the
public’s health and safety;
2. Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party states in
the areas of nurse licensure and regulation;
3. Facilitate the exchange of information between party
states in the areas of nurse regulation, investigation and adverse
actions;
4. Promote compliance with the laws governing the
practice of nursing in each jurisdiction;
5. Invest all party states with the authority to hold a nurse
accountable for meeting all state practice laws in the state in
which the patient is located at the time care is rendered through
the mutual recognition of party state licenses;
6. Decrease redundancies in the consideration and
issuance of nurse licenses; and
7. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by nurses
who meet uniform licensure requirements.

ARTICLE II.

DEFINITIONS

As used in this Compact:
a. “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable
or criminal action permitted by a state’s laws which is imposed by
a licensing board or other authority against a nurse, including
actions against an individual’s license or multistate licensure
privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of
the licensee, limitation on the licensee’s practice, or any other
encumbrance on licensure affecting a nurse’s authorization to
practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action.
b. “Alternative program” means a non-disciplinary
monitoring program approved by a licensing board.
c. “Coordinated licensure information system” means an
integrated process for collecting, storing and sharing information
on nurse licensure and enforcement activities related to nurse
licensure laws that is administered by a nonprofit organization
composed of and controlled by licensing boards.
d. “Current significant investigative information” means:
1. Investigative information that a licensing board, after a
preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity
for the nurse to respond, if required by state law, has reason to
believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more
than a minor infraction; or
-
*SB34*

– 49 –
2. Investigative information that indicates that the nurse
represents an immediate threat to public health and safety
regardless of whether the nurse has been notified and had an
opportunity to respond.
e. “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or
any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of nursing
imposed by a licensing board.
f. “Home state” means the party state which is the nurse’s
primary state of residence.
g. “Licensing board” means a party state’s regulatory body
responsible for issuing nurse licenses.
h. “Multistate license” means a license to practice as a
registered or a licensed practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN)
issued by a home state licensing board that authorizes the licensed
nurse to practice in all party states under a multistate licensure
privilege.
i. “Multistate licensure privilege” means a legal
authorization associated with a multistate license permitting the
practice of nursing as either a registered nurse (RN) or LPN/VN
in a remote state.
j. “Nurse” means RN or LPN/VN, as those terms are defined
by each party state’s practice laws.
k. “Party state” means any state that has adopted this
Compact.
l. “Remote state” means a party state, other than the home
state.
m. “Single-state license” means a nurse license issued by a
party state that authorizes practice only within the issuing state
and does not include a multistate licensure privilege to practice in
any other party state.
n. “State” means a state, territory or possession of the United
States and the District of Columbia.
o. “State practice laws” means a party state’s laws, rules and
regulations that govern the practice of nursing, define the scope of
nursing practice, and create the methods and grounds for
imposing discipline. “State practice laws” do not include
requirements necessary to obtain and retain a license, except for
qualifications or requirements of the home state.

ARTICLE III.

GENERAL PROVISIONS AND JURISDICTION

a. A multistate license to practice registered or licensed
practical/vocational nursing issued by a home state to a resident in
-
*SB34*

– 50 –
that state will be recognized by each party state as authorizing a
nurse to practice as a registered nurse (RN) or as a licensed
practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN), under a multistate licensure
privilege, in each party state.
b. A state must implement procedures for considering the
criminal history records of applicants for initial multistate license
or licensure by endorsement. Such procedures shall include the
submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information
by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal
history record information from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state’s
criminal records.
c. Each party state shall require the following for an
applicant to obtain or retain a multistate license in the home state:
1. Meets the home state’s qualifications for licensure or
renewal of licensure, as well as all other applicable state laws;
2. i. Has graduated or is eligible to graduate from a
licensing board-approved RN or LPN/VN prelicensure education
program; or
ii. Has graduated from a foreign RN or LPN/VN
prelicensure education program that (a) has been approved by the
authorized accrediting body in the applicable country and (b) has
been verified by an independent credentials review agency to be
comparable to a licensing board-approved prelicensure education
program;
3. Has, if a graduate of a foreign prelicensure education
program not taught in English or if English is not the individual’s
native language, successfully passed an English proficiency
examination that includes the components of reading, speaking,
writing and listening;
4. Has successfully passed an NCLEX-RN or NCLEX-PN
Examination or recognized predecessor, as applicable;
5. Is eligible for or holds an active, unencumbered license;
6. Has submitted, in connection with an application for
initial licensure or licensure by endorsement, fingerprints or other
biometric data for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record
information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the
agency responsible for retaining that state’s criminal records;
7. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered
into an agreed disposition, of a felony offense under applicable
state or federal criminal law;
8. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered
into an agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor offense related to the
practice of nursing as determined on a case-by-case basis;
9. Is not currently enrolled in an alternative program;
-
*SB34*

– 51 –
10. Is subject to self-disclosure requirements regarding
current participation in an alternative program; and
11. Has a valid United States Social Security number.
d. All party states shall be authorized, in accordance with
existing state due process law, to take adverse action against a
nurse’s multistate licensure privilege such as revocation,
suspension, probation or any other action that affects a nurse’s
authorization to practice under a multistate licensure privilege,
including cease and desist actions. If a party state takes such
action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the
coordinated licensure information system. The administrator of
the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify
the home state of any such actions by remote states.
e. A nurse practicing in a party state must comply with the
state practice laws of the state in which the client is located at the
time service is provided. The practice of nursing is not limited to
patient care, but shall include all nursing practice as defined by
the state practice laws of the party state in which the client is
located. The practice of nursing in a party state under a multistate
licensure privilege will subject a nurse to the jurisdiction of the
licensing board, the courts and the laws of the party state in which
the client is located at the time service is provided.
f. Individuals not residing in a party state shall continue to be
able to apply for a party state’s single-state license as provided
under the laws of each party state. However, the single-state
license granted to these individuals will not be recognized as
granting the privilege to practice nursing in any other party state.
Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established
by a party state for the issuance of a single-state license.
g. Any nurse holding a home state multistate license, on the
effective date of this Compact, may retain and renew the multistate
license issued by the nurse’s then-current home state, provided
that:
1. A nurse, who changes primary state of residence after
this Compact’s effective date, must meet all applicable Article
III.c. requirements to obtain a multistate license from a new home
state.
2. A nurse who fails to satisfy the multistate licensure
requirements in Article III.c. due to a disqualifying event
occurring after this Compact’s effective date shall be ineligible to
retain or renew a multistate license, and the nurse’s multistate
license shall be revoked or deactivated in accordance with
applicable rules adopted by the Interstate Commission of Nurse
Licensure Compact Administrators (“Commission”).
-
*SB34*

– 52 –
ARTICLE IV.

APPLICATIONS FOR LICENSURE IN A PARTY STATE

a. Upon application for a multistate license, the licensing
board in the issuing party state shall ascertain, through the
coordinated licensure information system, whether the applicant
has ever held, or is the holder of, a license issued by any other
state, whether there are any encumbrances on any license or
multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, whether any
adverse action has been taken against any license or multistate
licensure privilege held by the applicant and whether the applicant
is currently participating in an alternative program.
b. A nurse may hold a multistate license, issued by the home
state, in only one party state at a time.
c. If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving
between two party states, the nurse must apply for licensure in the
new home state, and the multistate license issued by the prior
home state will be deactivated in accordance with applicable rules
adopted by the Commission.
1. The nurse may apply for licensure in advance of a
change in primary state of residence.
2. A multistate license shall not be issued by the new home
state until the nurse provides satisfactory evidence of a change in
primary state of residence to the new home state and satisfies all
applicable requirements to obtain a multistate license from the
new home state.
d. If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving
from a party state to a non-party state, the multistate license issued
by the prior home state will convert to a single-state license, valid
only in the former home state.

ARTICLE V.

ADDITIONAL AUTHORITIES INVESTED IN
PARTY STATE LICENSING BOARDS

a. In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a
licensing board shall have the authority to:
1. Take adverse action against a nurse’s multistate
licensure privilege to practice within that party state.
i. Only the home state shall have the power to take
adverse action against a nurse’s license issued by the home state.
ii. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home
state licensing board shall give the same priority and effect to
-
*SB34*

– 53 –
reported conduct received from a remote state as it would if such
conduct had occurred within the home state. In so doing, the
home state shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate
action.
2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an
encumbrance on a nurse’s authority to practice within that party
state.
3. Complete any pending investigations of a nurse who
changes primary state of residence during the course of such
investigations. The licensing board shall also have the authority to
take appropriate action(s) and shall promptly report the
conclusions of such investigations to the administrator of the
coordinated licensure information system. The administrator of
the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify
the new home state of any such actions.
4. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations
that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as
the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing board
in a party state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or
the production of evidence from another party state shall be
enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction,
according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to
subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing
authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and
other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the
witnesses or evidence are located.
5. Obtain and submit, for each nurse licensure applicant,
fingerprint or other biometric-based information to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for criminal background checks, receive
the results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search
on criminal background checks and use the results in making
licensure decisions.
6. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the
affected nurse the costs of investigations and disposition of cases
resulting from any adverse action taken against that nurse.
7. Take adverse action based on the factual findings of the
remote state, provided that the licensing board follows its own
procedures for taking such adverse action.
b. If adverse action is taken by the home state against a
nurse’s multistate license, the nurse’s multistate licensure
privilege to practice in all other party states shall be deactivated
until all encumbrances have been removed from the multistate
license. All home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse
action against a nurse’s multistate license shall include a
-
*SB34*

– 54 –
statement that the nurse’s multistate licensure privilege is
deactivated in all party states during the pendency of the order.
c. Nothing in this Compact shall override a party state’s
decision that participation in an alternative program may be used
in lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board shall
deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the multistate
license of any nurse for the duration of the nurse’s participation
in an alternative program.

ARTICLE VI.

COORDINATED LICENSURE INFORMATION SYSTEM
AND EXCHANGE OF INFORMATION

a. All party states shall participate in a coordinated licensure
information system of all licensed registered nurses (RNs) and
licensed practical/vocational nurses (LPNs/VNs). This system will
include information on the licensure and disciplinary history of
each nurse, as submitted by party states, to assist in the
coordination of nurse licensure and enforcement efforts.
b. The Commission, in consultation with the administrator of
the coordinated licensure information system, shall formulate
necessary and proper procedures for the identification, collection
and exchange of information under this Compact.
c. All licensing boards shall promptly report to the
coordinated licensure information system any adverse action, any
current significant investigative information, denials of
applications (with the reasons for such denials) and nurse
participation in alternative programs known to the licensing board
regardless of whether such participation is deemed nonpublic or
confidential under state law.
d. Current significant investigative information and
participation in nonpublic or confidential alternative programs
shall be transmitted through the coordinated licensure
information system only to party state licensing boards.
e. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all party state
licensing boards contributing information to the coordinated
licensure information system may designate information that may
not be shared with non-party states or disclosed to other entities or
individuals without the express permission of the contributing
state.
f. Any personally identifiable information obtained from the
coordinated licensure information system by a party state licensing
board shall not be shared with non-party states or disclosed to
-
*SB34*

– 55 –
other entities or individuals except to the extent permitted by the
laws of the party state contributing the information.
g. Any information contributed to the coordinated licensure
information system that is subsequently required to be expunged
by the laws of the party state contributing that information shall
also be expunged from the coordinated licensure information
system.
h. The Compact administrator of each party state shall
furnish a uniform data set to the Compact administrator of each
other party state, which shall include, at a minimum:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Information related to alternative program
participation; and
4. Other information that may facilitate the administration
of this Compact, as determined by Commission rules.
i. The Compact administrator of a party state shall provide all
investigative documents and information requested by another
party state.

ARTICLE VII.

ESTABLISHMENT OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION
OF NURSE LICENSURE COMPACT ADMINISTRATORS

a. The party states hereby create and establish a joint public
entity known as the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure
Compact Administrators.
1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the party
states.
2. Venue is proper, and judicial proceedings by or against
the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively, in a court
of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a
waiver of sovereign immunity.
b. Membership, Voting and Meetings
1. Each party state shall have and be limited to one
administrator. The head of the state licensing board or designee
shall be the administrator of this Compact for each party state.
Any administrator may be removed or suspended from office as
provided by the law of the state from which the Administrator is
appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the Commission shall be
-
*SB34*

– 56 –
filled in accordance with the laws of the party state in which the
vacancy exists.
2. Each administrator shall be entitled to one (1) vote with
regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and
shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business
and affairs of the Commission. An administrator shall vote in
person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The
bylaws may provide for an administrator’s participation in
meetings by telephone or other means of communication.
3. The Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the
bylaws or rules of the commission.
4. All meetings shall be open to the public, and public
notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required
under the rulemaking provisions in Article VIII.
5. The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic
meeting if the Commission must discuss:
i. Noncompliance of a party state with its obligations
under this Compact;
ii. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
personnel matters, practices or procedures related to specific
employees or other matters related to the Commission’s internal
personnel practices and procedures;
iii. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
iv. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of
goods, services or real estate;
v. Accusing any person of a crime or formally
censuring any person;
vi. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or
financial information that is privileged or confidential;
vii. Disclosure of information of a personal nature
where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion
of personal privacy;
viii. Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for
law enforcement purposes;
ix. Disclosure of information related to any reports
prepared by or on behalf of the Commission for the purpose of
investigation of compliance with this Compact; or
x. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or state statute.
6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant
to this provision, the Commission’s legal counsel or designee shall
certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each
relevant exempting provision. The Commission shall keep minutes
-
*SB34*

– 57 –
that fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting
and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken,
and the reasons therefor, including a description of the views
expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action
shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of
a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a
majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
c. The Commission shall, by a majority vote of the
administrators, prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its conduct as
may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and
exercise the powers of this Compact, including but not limited to:
1. Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Providing reasonable standards and procedures:
i. For the establishment and meetings of other
committees; and
ii. Governing any general or specific delegation of any
authority or function of the Commission;
3. Providing reasonable procedures for calling and
conducting meetings of the Commission, ensuring reasonable
advance notice of all meetings and providing an opportunity for
attendance of such meetings by interested parties, with
enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public’s interest,
the privacy of individuals, and proprietary information, including
trade secrets. The Commission may meet in closed session only
after a majority of the administrators vote to close a meeting in
whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the Commission must
make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing the
vote of each administrator, with no proxy votes allowed;
4. Establishing the titles, duties and authority and
reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of the
Commission;
5. Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the
establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the
Commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar
laws of any party state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the
personnel policies and programs of the Commission; and
6. Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations
of the Commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus
funds that may exist after the termination of this Compact after
the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations;
d. The Commission shall publish its bylaws and rules, and
any amendments thereto, in a convenient form on the website of
the Commission.
-
*SB34*

– 58 –
e. The Commission shall maintain its financial records in
accordance with the bylaws.
f. The Commission shall meet and take such actions as are
consistent with the provisions of this Compact and the bylaws.
g. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. To promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and
coordinate implementation and administration of this Compact.
The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be
binding in all party states;
2. To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in
the name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any
licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be
affected;
3. To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
4. To borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a party state or
nonprofit organizations;
5. To cooperate with other organizations that administer
state compacts related to the regulation of nursing, including but
not limited to sharing administrative or staff expenses, office space
or other resources;
6. To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate
authority to carry out the purposes of this Compact, and to
establish the Commission’s personnel policies and programs
relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel and
other related personnel matters;
7. To accept any and all appropriate donations, grants and
gifts of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to
receive, utilize and dispose of the same; provided that at all times
the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or
conflict of interest;
8. To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or
donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any
property, whether real, personal or mixed; provided that at all
times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety;
9. To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
abandon or otherwise dispose of any property, whether real,
personal or mixed;
10. To establish a budget and make expenditures;
11. To borrow money;
12. To appoint committees, including advisory committees
comprised of administrators, state nursing regulators, state
legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives,
and other such interested persons;
-
*SB34*

– 59 –
13. To provide and receive information from, and to
cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;
14. To adopt and use an official seal; and
15. To perform such other functions as may be necessary
or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact consistent
with the state regulation of nurse licensure and practice.
h. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment
of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and
ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may also levy on and collect an
annual assessment from each party state to cover the cost of its
operations, activities and staff in its annual budget as approved
each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount, if any, shall
be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the
Commission, which shall promulgate a rule that is binding upon
all party states.
3. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall
the Commission pledge the credit of any of the party states, except
by, and with the authority of, such party state.
4. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the
Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and
disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be
audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the
report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the
annual report of the Commission.
i. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification
1. The administrators, officers, executive director,
employees and representatives of the Commission shall be immune
from suit and liability, either personally or in their official
capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or
personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of
any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that
the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis
for believing occurred, within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in
this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from
suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury or liability caused by
the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
2. The Commission shall defend any administrator,
officer, executive director, employee or representative of the
Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising
-
*SB34*

– 60 –
out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made
had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that
nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from
retaining his or her own counsel; and provided further that the
actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from that
person’s intentional, willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless
any administrator, officer, executive director, employee or
representative of the Commission for the amount of any settlement
or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual
or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties or responsibilities,
provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not
result from the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.

ARTICLE VIII.

RULEMAKING

a. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Article and the rules
adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding
as of the date specified in each rule or amendment and shall have
the same force and effect as provisions of this Compact.
b. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a
regular or special meeting of the Commission.
c. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules
by the Commission, and at least sixty (60) days in advance of the
meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted upon, the
Commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission; and
2. On the website of each licensing board or the
publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed
rules.
d. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in
which the rule will be considered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment, and the
reason for the proposed rule;
-
*SB34*

– 61 –
3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any
interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit
notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the public
hearing and any written comments.
e. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall
allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and
arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
f. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public
hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment.
g. The Commission shall publish the place, time and date of
the scheduled public hearing.
1. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing
each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable
opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All hearings will be
recorded, and a copy will be made available upon request.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the
convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
section.
h. If no one appears at the public hearing, the Commission
may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule.
i. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of
business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not
held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral comments
received.
j. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all
administrators, take final action on the proposed rule and shall
determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the
rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
k. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
Commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without
prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided that
the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this Compact and in
this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an
emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order
to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or
welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or party state funds; or
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an
administrative rule that is required by federal law or rule.
-
*SB34*

– 62 –
l. The Commission may direct revisions to a previously
adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency or
grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted
on the website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to
challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after
posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the
revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall
be made in writing, and delivered to the Commission, prior to the
end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will
take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the
revision may not take effect without the approval of the
Commission.

ARTICLE IX.

OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ENFORCEMENT

a. Oversight
1. Each party state shall enforce this Compact and take all
actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate this Compact’s
purposes and intent.
2. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding that may affect the powers,
responsibilities or actions of the Commission, and shall have
standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes.
Failure to provide service of process in such proceeding to the
Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the
Commission, this Compact or promulgated rules.
b. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a party state has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities
under this Compact or the promulgated rules, the Commission
shall:
i. Provide written notice to the defaulting state and
other party states of the nature of the default, the proposed means
of curing the default or any other action to be taken by the
Commission; and
ii. Provide remedial training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
2. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the
defaulting state’s membership in this Compact may be terminated
upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the administrators, and
all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this Compact may
be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the
-
*SB34*

– 63 –
default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or
liabilities incurred during the period of default.
3. Termination of membership in this Compact shall be
imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have
been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be
given by the Commission to the governor of the defaulting state
and to the executive officer of the defaulting state’s licensing
board and each of the party states.
4. A state whose membership in this Compact has been
terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and
liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination,
including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of
termination.
5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a
state that is found to be in default or whose membership in this
Compact has been terminated unless agreed upon in writing
between the Commission and the defaulting state.
6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the
Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District
of Columbia or the federal district in which the Commission has
its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys’ fees.
c. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a party state, the Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise
among party states and between party and non-party states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as
appropriate.
3. In the event the Commission cannot resolve disputes
among party states arising under this Compact:
i. The party states may submit the issues in dispute to
an arbitration panel, which will be comprised of individuals
appointed by the Compact administrator in each of the affected
party states and an individual mutually agreed upon by the
Compact administrators of all the party states involved in the
dispute.
ii. The decision of a majority of the arbitrators shall be
final and binding.
d. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal
action in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district in which the Commission has its principal offices
-
*SB34*

– 64 –
against a party state that is in default to enforce compliance with
the provisions of this Compact and its promulgated rules and
bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and
damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorneys’ fees.
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies
of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or state law.

ARTICLE X.

EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL AND AMENDMENT

a. This Compact shall become effective and binding on the
earlier of the date of legislative enactment of this Compact into
law by no less than twenty-six (26) states or December 31, 2018.
All party states to this Compact, that also were parties to the prior
Nurse Licensure Compact, superseded by this Compact, (“Prior
Compact”), shall be deemed to have withdrawn from said Prior
Compact within six (6) months after the effective date of this
Compact.
b. Each party state to this Compact shall continue to
recognize a nurse’s multistate licensure privilege to practice in
that party state issued under the Prior Compact until such party
state has withdrawn from the Prior Compact.
c. Any party state may withdraw from this Compact by
enacting a statute repealing the same. A party state’s withdrawal
shall not take effect until six (6) months after enactment of the
repealing statute.
d. A party state’s withdrawal or termination shall not affect
the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or terminated
state’s licensing board to report adverse actions and significant
investigations occurring prior to the effective date of such
withdrawal or termination.
e. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any nurse licensure agreement or other
cooperative arrangement between a party state and a non-party
state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of this
Compact.
f. This Compact may be amended by the party states. No
amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding
upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the laws of
all party states.
-
*SB34*

– 65 –
g. Representatives of non-party states to this Compact shall
be invited to participate in the activities of the Commission, on a
nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of this Compact by all states.

ARTICLE XI.

CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate
the purposes thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be
severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this
Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party
state or of the United States, or if the applicability thereof to any
government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the
validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability
thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall
not be affected thereby. If this Compact shall be held to be
contrary to the constitution of any party state, this Compact shall
remain in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and
in full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all
severable matters.
Sec. 11. NRS 632.307 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.307 1. The Board may place any condition, limitation or
restriction on any license or certificate issued pursuant to this
chapter if the Board determines that such action is necessary to
protect the public health, safety or welfare.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 10 of this
act, the Board shall not report any condition, limitation or restriction
placed on a license or certificate issued pursuant to this section to
the National Council of State Boards of Nursing Disciplinary Data
Bank or any other repository which records disciplinary action taken
against licensees or holders of certificates, unless the licensee or
holder of the certificate fails to comply with the condition, limitation
or restriction placed on the license or certificate. The Board may,
upon request, report any such information to an agency of another
state which regulates the practice of nursing.
3. The Board may modify any condition, limitation or
restriction placed on a license or certificate issued pursuant to this
section if the Board determines it is necessary to protect the public
health, safety or welfare.
4. Any condition, limitation or restriction placed on a license or
certificate issued pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to be
disciplinary action taken pursuant to NRS 632.349.
-
*SB34*

– 66 –
Sec. 12. NRS 632.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.405 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 239.0115 [,] and section 10 of this act, any records or
information obtained during the course of an investigation by the
Board and any record of the investigation are confidential.
2. The complaint or other document filed by the Board to
initiate disciplinary action and all documents and information
considered by the Board when determining whether to impose
disciplinary action are public records.
3. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
another licensing board or any agency that is investigating a person,
including a law enforcement agency.
Sec. 13. Chapter 633 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 14 and 15 of this act.
Sec. 14. “PA Licensure Compact” means the PA Licensure
Compact ratified and entered into in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 15. 1. The Board shall perform all duties imposed on
this State by the PA Licensure Compact with respect to a physician
assistant who is licensed pursuant to this chapter.
2. The Board has jurisdiction over a physician assistant who
is practicing in this State under a compact privilege pursuant to
the PA Licensure Compact if the physician assistant:
(a) Is licensed by a professional licensing board or other
governmental entity in another jurisdiction that licenses
osteopathic physician assistants and does not license allopathic
physician assistants; or
(b) Received his or her education as a physician assistant
primarily in osteopathic techniques and is licensed by a
professional licensing board or other governmental entity in
another jurisdiction that licenses both allopathic and osteopathic
physician assistants.
Sec. 16. NRS 633.011 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.011 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 633.013 to 633.131,
inclusive, and section 14 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 17. NRS 633.107 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.107 “Physician assistant” means a person who is [a] :
1. A graduate of an academic program approved by the Board
or who, by general education, practical training and experience
determined to be satisfactory by the Board, is qualified to perform
medical services under the supervision of a supervising osteopathic
physician and who has been issued a license by the Board [.] ; or
-
*SB34*

– 67 –
2. Practicing in this State under a compact privilege pursuant
to the PA Licensure Compact and is under the jurisdiction of the
Board pursuant to section 15 of this act.
Sec. 18. NRS 633.301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.301 1. The Board shall keep a record of its proceedings
relating to licensing and disciplinary actions. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the record must be open to public
inspection at all reasonable times and contain the name, known
place of business and residence, and the date and number of the
license of every osteopathic physician, physician assistant and
anesthesiologist assistant licensed under this chapter.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section and NRS
239.0115 [,] and section 1 of this act, a complaint filed with the
Board, all documents and other information filed with the complaint
and all documents and other information compiled as a result of an
investigation conducted to determine whether to initiate disciplinary
action against a person are confidential, unless the person submits a
written statement to the Board requesting that such documents and
information be made public records.
3. The charging documents filed with the Board to initiate
disciplinary action pursuant to chapter 622A of NRS and all other
documents and information considered by the Board when
determining whether to impose discipline are public records.
4. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
any other licensing board or any other agency that is investigating a
person, including, without limitation, a law enforcement agency.
Sec. 19. NRS 633.442 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.442 1. A physician assistant shall:
(a) Keep his or her license or proof that he or she is authorized
to practice in this State under the PA Licensure Compact, as
applicable, available for inspection at his or her primary place of
business; and
(b) When engaged in professional duties, identify himself or
herself as a physician assistant.
2. A physician assistant shall not bill a patient separately from
his or her supervising osteopathic physician.
Sec. 20. NRS 633.524 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.524 1. The Board shall require each holder of a license to
practice osteopathic medicine issued pursuant to this chapter to
submit to the Board, on a form provided by the Board, and in the
format required by the Board by regulation, a report stating the
number and type of surgeries requiring conscious sedation, deep
sedation or general anesthesia performed by the holder of the license
-
*SB34*

– 68 –
at his or her office or any other facility, excluding any surgical care
performed:
(a) At a medical facility as that term is defined in NRS
449.0151; or
(b) Outside of this State.
2. In addition to the report required pursuant to subsection 1,
the Board shall require each holder of a license to practice
osteopathic medicine to submit a report to the Board concerning the
occurrence of any sentinel event arising from any surgery described
in subsection 1. The report must be submitted in the manner
prescribed by the Board which must be substantially similar to the
manner prescribed by the State Board of Health for reporting
information pursuant to NRS 439.835.
3. Each holder of a license to practice osteopathic medicine
shall submit the reports required pursuant to subsections 1 and 2:
(a) At the time the holder of the license renews his or her
license; and
(b) Whether or not the holder of the license performed any
surgery described in subsection 1. Failure to submit a report or
knowingly or willfully filing false information in a report constitutes
grounds for initiating disciplinary action pursuant to NRS 633.511.
4. In addition to the reports required pursuant to subsections 1
and 2, the Board shall require each holder of a license to practice
osteopathic medicine to submit a report to the Board concerning the
occurrence of any sentinel event arising from any surgery described
in subsection 1 within 14 days after the occurrence of the sentinel
event. The report must be submitted in the manner prescribed by the
Board.
5. The Board shall:
(a) Collect and maintain reports received pursuant to subsections
1, 2 and 4;
(b) Ensure that the reports, and any additional documents
created from the reports, are protected adequately from fire, theft,
loss, destruction and other hazards, and from unauthorized access;
and
(c) Submit to the Division of Public and Behavioral Health a
copy of the report submitted pursuant to subsection 1. The Division
shall maintain the confidentiality of such reports in accordance with
subsection 6.
6. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115 [,] and
section 1 of this act, a report received pursuant to subsection 1, 2 or
4 is confidential, not subject to subpoena or discovery, and not
subject to inspection by the general public.
7. The provisions of this section do not apply to surgical care
requiring only the administration of oral medication to a patient to
-
*SB34*

– 69 –
relieve the patient’s anxiety or pain, if the medication is not given in
a dosage that is sufficient to induce in a patient a controlled state of
depressed consciousness or unconsciousness similar to general
anesthesia, deep sedation or conscious sedation.
8. In addition to any other remedy or penalty, if a holder of a
license to practice osteopathic medicine fails to submit a report or
knowingly or willfully files false information in a report submitted
pursuant to this section, the Board may, after providing the holder of
a license to practice osteopathic medicine with notice and
opportunity for a hearing, impose against the holder of a license an
administrative penalty for each such violation. The Board shall
establish by regulation a sliding scale based on the severity of the
violation to determine the amount of the administrative penalty to be
imposed against the holder of the license to practice osteopathic
medicine. The regulations must include standards for determining
the severity of the violation and may provide for a more severe
penalty for multiple violations.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Conscious sedation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.436.
(b) “Deep sedation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.437.
(c) “General anesthesia” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.438.
(d) “Sentinel event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 439.830.
Sec. 21. Chapter 637B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate
Compact is hereby ratified and entered into with all other
jurisdictions legally joining the Compact, in substantially the form
set forth in this section:

AUDIOLOGY AND SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY
INTERSTATE COMPACT

SECTION 1. PURPOSE

The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate practice
of audiology and speech-language pathology with the goal of
improving public access to audiology and speech-language
pathology services. The practice of audiology and speech-
language pathology occurs in the state where the
patient/client/student is located at the time of the
patient/client/student encounter. The Compact preserves
-
*SB34*

– 70 –
the regulatory authority of states to protect public health and
safety through the current system of state licensure.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
1. Increase public access to audiology and speech-language
pathology services by providing for the mutual recognition of
other member state licenses;
2. Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health
and safety;
3. Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating
multistate audiology and speech-language pathology practice;
4. Support spouses of relocating active duty military
personnel;
5. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative and
disciplinary information between member states;
6. Allow a remote state to hold a provider of services with a
compact privilege in that state accountable to that state’s practice
standards; and
7. Allow for the use of telehealth technology to facilitate
increased access to audiology and speech-language pathology
services.

SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS

As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the
following definitions shall apply:
A. “Active duty military” means full-time duty status in the
active uniformed service of the United States, including members
of the National Guard and Reserve on active duty orders pursuant
to 10 U.S.C. Chapter 1209 and 1211.
B. “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil,
equitable or criminal action permitted by a state’s laws which is
imposed by a licensing board or other authority against an
audiologist or speech-language pathologist, including actions
against an individual’s license or privilege to practice such as
revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, or
restriction on the licensee’s practice.
C. “Alternative program” means a non-disciplinary
monitoring process approved by an audiology or speech-language
pathology licensing board to address impaired practitioners.
D. “Audiologist” means an individual who is licensed by a
state to practice audiology.
E. “Audiology” means the care and services provided by a
licensed audiologist as set forth in the member state’s statutes and
rules.
-
*SB34*

– 71 –
F. “Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Compact
Commission” or “Commission” means the national administrative
body whose membership consists of all states that have enacted the
Compact.
G. “Audiology and speech-language pathology licensing
board,” “audiology licensing board,” “speech-language pathology
licensing board,” or “licensing board” means the agency of a state
that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of audiologists
and/or speech-language pathologists.
H. “Compact privilege” means the authorization granted by a
remote state to allow a licensee from another member state to
practice as an audiologist or speech-language pathologist in the
remote state under its laws and rules. The practice of audiology or
speech-language pathology occurs in the member state where the
patient/client/student is located at the time of the
patient/client/student encounter.
I. “Current significant investigative information” means
investigative information that a licensing board, after an inquiry
or investigation that includes notification and an opportunity for
the audiologist or speech-language pathologist to respond, if
required by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless and,
if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction.
J. “Data system” means a repository of information about
licensees, including, but not limited to, continuing education,
examination, licensure, investigative, compact privilege and
adverse action.
K. “Encumbered license” means a license in which an
adverse action restricts the practice of audiology or speech-
language pathology by the licensee and said adverse action has
been reported to the National Practitioners Data Bank (NPDB).
L. “Executive Committee” means a group of directors elected
or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to
them by, the Commission.
M. “Home state” means the member state that is the
licensee’s primary state of residence.
N. “Impaired practitioner” means individuals whose
professional practice is adversely affected by substance abuse,
addiction, or other health-related conditions.
O. “Licensee” means an individual who currently holds an
authorization from the state licensing board to practice as an
audiologist or speech-language pathologist.
P. “Member state” means a state that has enacted the
Compact.
-
*SB34*

– 72 –
Q. “Privilege to practice” means a legal authorization
permitting the practice of audiology or speech-language pathology
in a remote state.
R. “Remote state” means a member state other than the home
state where a licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise the
compact privilege.
S. “Rule” means a regulation, principle or directive
promulgated by the Commission that has the force of law.
T. “Single-state license” means an audiology or speech-
language pathology license issued by a member state that
authorizes practice only within the issuing state and does not
include a privilege to practice in any other member state.
U. “Speech-language pathologist” means an individual who
is licensed by a state to practice speech-language pathology.
V. “Speech-language pathology” means the care and services
provided by a licensed speech-language pathologist as set forth in
the member state’s statutes and rules.
W. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district or
territory of the United States of America that regulates the practice
of audiology and speech-language pathology.
X. “State practice laws” means a member state’s laws, rules
and regulations that govern the practice of audiology or speech-
language pathology, define the scope of audiology or speech-
language pathology practice, and create the methods and grounds
for imposing discipline.
Y. “Telehealth” means the application of telecommunication
technology to deliver audiology or speech-language pathology
services at a distance for assessment, intervention and/or
consultation.

SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT

A. A license issued to an audiologist or speech-language
pathologist by a home state to a resident in that state shall be
recognized by each member state as authorizing an audiologist or
speech-language pathologist to practice audiology or speech-
language pathology, under a privilege to practice, in each member
state.
B. A state must implement or utilize procedures for
considering the criminal history records of applicants for initial
privilege to practice. These procedures shall include the
submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information
by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal
history record information from the Federal Bureau of
-
*SB34*

– 73 –
Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state’s
criminal records.
1. A member state must fully implement a criminal
background check requirement, within a time frame established by
rule, by receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation record search on criminal background checks and
use the results in making licensure decisions.
2. Communication between a member state, the
Commission and among member states regarding the verification
of eligibility for licensure through the Compact shall not include
any information received from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation relating to a federal criminal records check
performed by a member state under Public Law 92-544.
C. Upon application for a privilege to practice, the licensing
board in the issuing remote state shall ascertain, through the data
system, whether the applicant has ever held, or is the holder of, a
license issued by any other state, whether there are any
encumbrances on any license or privilege to practice held by the
applicant, whether any adverse action has been taken against any
license or privilege to practice held by the applicant.
D. Each member state shall require an applicant to obtain or
retain a license in the home state and meet the home state’s
qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as, all
other applicable state laws.
E. For an audiologist:
1. Must meet one of the following educational
requirements:
a. On or before, Dec. 31, 2007, has graduated with a
master’s degree or doctorate in audiology, or equivalent degree
regardless of degree name, from a program that is accredited by
an accrediting agency recognized by the Council for Higher
Education Accreditation, or its successor, or by the United States
Department of Education and operated by a college or university
accredited by a regional or national accrediting organization
recognized by the board; or
b. On or after, Jan. 1, 2008, has graduated with a
Doctoral degree in audiology, or equivalent degree, regardless of
degree name, from a program that is accredited by an accrediting
agency recognized by the Council for Higher Education
Accreditation, or its successor, or by the United States Department
of Education and operated by a college or university accredited by
a regional or national accrediting organization recognized by the
board; or
c. Has graduated from an audiology program that is
housed in an institution of higher education outside of the United
-
*SB34*

– 74 –
States (a) for which the program and institution have been
approved by the authorized accrediting body in the applicable
country and (b) the degree program has been verified by an
independent credentials review agency to be comparable to a state
licensing board-approved program.
2. Has completed a supervised clinical practicum
experience from an accredited educational institution or its
cooperating programs as required by the Commission;
3. Has successfully passed a national examination
approved by the Commission;
4. Holds an active, unencumbered license;
5. Has not been convicted or found guilty, and has not
entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony related to the
practice of audiology, under applicable state or federal criminal
law;
6. Has a valid United States Social Security or National
Practitioner Identification number.
F. For a speech-language pathologist:
1. Must meet one of the following educational
requirements:
a. Has graduated with a master’s degree from a speech-
language pathology program that is accredited by an organization
recognized by the United States Department of Education and
operated by a college or university accredited by a regional or
national accrediting organization recognized by the board; or
b. Has graduated from a speech-language pathology
program that is housed in an institution of higher education
outside of the United States (a) for which the program and
institution have been approved by the authorized accrediting body
in the applicable country and (b) the degree program has been
verified by an independent credentials review agency to be
comparable to a state licensing board-approved program.
2. Has completed a supervised clinical practicum
experience from an educational institution or its cooperating
programs as required by the Commission;
3. Has completed a supervised postgraduate professional
experience as required by the Commission;
4. Has successfully passed a national examination
approved by the Commission;
5. Holds an active, unencumbered license;
6. Has not been convicted or found guilty, and has not
entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony related to the
practice of speech-language pathology, under applicable state or
federal criminal law;
-
*SB34*

– 75 –
7. Has a valid United States Social Security or National
Practitioner Identification number.
G. The privilege to practice is derived from the home state
license.
H. An audiologist or speech-language pathologist practicing
in a member state must comply with the state practice laws of the
state in which the client is located at the time service is provided.
The practice of audiology and speech-language pathology shall
include all audiology and speech-language pathology practice as
defined by the state practice laws of the member state in which the
client is located. The practice of audiology and speech-language
pathology in a member state under a privilege to practice shall
subject an audiologist or speech-language pathologist to the
jurisdiction of the licensing board, the courts and the laws of the
member state in which the client is located at the time service is
provided.
I. Individuals not residing in a member state shall continue to
be able to apply for a member state’s single-state license as
provided under the laws of each member state. However, the
single-state license granted to these individuals shall not be
recognized as granting the privilege to practice audiology or
speech-language pathology in any other member state. Nothing in
this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a
member state for the issuance of a single-state license.
J. Member states may charge a fee for granting a compact
privilege.
K. Member states must comply with the bylaws and rules and
regulations of the Commission.

SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE

A. To exercise the compact privilege under the terms and
provisions of the Compact, the audiologist or speech-language
pathologist shall:
1. Hold an active license in the home state;
2. Have no encumbrance on any state license;
3. Be eligible for a compact privilege in any member state
in accordance with Section 3;
4. Have not had any adverse action against any license or
compact privilege within the previous 2 years from date of
application;
5. Notify the Commission that the licensee is seeking the
compact privilege within a remote state(s);
6. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the
compact privilege;
-
*SB34*

– 76 –
7. Report to the Commission adverse action taken by any
non-member state within 30 days from the date the adverse action
is taken.
B. For the purposes of the compact privilege, an audiologist
or speech-language pathologist shall only hold one home state
license at a time.
C. Except as provided in Section 6, if an audiologist or
speech-language pathologist changes primary state of residence by
moving between two-member states, the audiologist or speech-
language pathologist must apply for licensure in the new home
state, and the license issued by the prior home state shall be
deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the
Commission.
D. The audiologist or speech-language pathologist may apply
for licensure in advance of a change in primary state of residence.
E. A license shall not be issued by the new home state until
the audiologist or speech-language pathologist provides
satisfactory evidence of a change in primary state of residence to
the new home state and satisfies all applicable requirements to
obtain a license from the new home state.
F. If an audiologist or speech-language pathologist changes
primary state of residence by moving from a member state to a
non-member state, the license issued by the prior home state shall
convert to a single-state license, valid only in the former home
state.
G. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date of
the home state license. The licensee must comply with the
requirements of Section 4A to maintain the compact privilege in
the remote state.
H. A licensee providing audiology or speech-language
pathology services in a remote state under the compact privilege
shall function within the laws and regulations of the remote state.
I. A licensee providing audiology or speech-language
pathology services in a remote state is subject to that state’s
regulatory authority. A remote state may, in accordance with due
process and that state’s laws, remove a licensee’s compact
privilege in the remote state for a specific period of time, impose
fines, and/or take any other necessary actions to protect the health
and safety of its citizens.
J. If a home state license is encumbered, the licensee shall
lose the compact privilege in any remote state until the following
occur:
1. The home state license is no longer encumbered; and
2. Two years have elapsed from the date of the adverse
action.
-
*SB34*

– 77 –
K. Once an encumbered license in the home state is restored
to good standing, the licensee must meet the requirements of
Section 4A to obtain a compact privilege in any remote state.
L. Once the requirements of Section 4J have been met, the
licensee must meet the requirements in Section 4A to obtain a
compact privilege in a remote state.

SECTION 5. COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO
PRACTICE TELEHEALTH

Member states shall recognize the right of an audiologist or
speech-language pathologist, licensed by a home state in
accordance with Section 3 and under rules promulgated by the
Commission, to practice audiology or speech-language pathology
in any member state via telehealth under a privilege to practice as
provided in the Compact and rules promulgated by the
Commission.

SECTION 6. ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY
PERSONNEL OR THEIR SPOUSES

Active duty military personnel, or their spouse, shall designate
a home state where the individual has a current license in good
standing. The individual may retain the home state designation
during the period the service member is on active duty.
Subsequent to designating a home state, the individual shall only
change their home state through application for licensure in the
new state.

SECTION 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS

A. In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a
remote state shall have the authority, in accordance with existing
state due process law, to:
1. Take adverse action against an audiologist’s or speech-
language pathologist’s privilege to practice within that member
state.
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations
that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as
the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing board
in a member state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or
the production of evidence from another member state shall be
enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction,
according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to
subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing
-
*SB34*

– 78 –
authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and
other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the
witnesses or evidence are located.
3. Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse
action against a audiologist’s or speech-language pathologist’s
license issued by the home state.
B. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state shall
give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from
a member state as it would if the conduct had occurred within the
home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state
laws to determine appropriate action.
C. The home state shall complete any pending investigations
of an audiologist or speech-language pathologist who changes
primary state of residence during the course of the investigations.
The home state shall also have the authority to take appropriate
action(s) and shall promptly report the conclusions of the
investigations to the administrator of the data system. The
administrator of the coordinated licensure information system
shall promptly notify the new home state of any adverse actions.
D. If otherwise permitted by state law, the member state may
recover from the affected audiologist or speech-language
pathologist the costs of investigations and disposition of cases
resulting from any adverse action taken against that audiologist or
speech-language pathologist.
E. The member state may take adverse action based on the
factual findings of the remote state, provided that the member
state follows the member state’s own procedures for taking the
adverse action.
F. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a member state by
its respective audiology or speech-language pathology practice act
or other applicable state law, any member state may participate
with other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
2. Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual
investigation initiated under the Compact.
G. If adverse action is taken by the home state against an
audiologist’s or speech-language pathologist’s license, the
audiologist’s or speech-language pathologist’s privilege to practice
in all other member states shall be deactivated until all
encumbrances have been removed from the state license. All home
state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against an
audiologist’s or speech-language pathologist’s license shall
include a statement that the audiologist’s or speech-language
-
*SB34*

– 79 –
pathologist’s privilege to practice is deactivated in all member
states during the pendency of the order.
H. If a member state takes adverse action, it shall promptly
notify the administrator of the data system. The administrator of
the data system shall promptly notify the home state of any adverse
actions by remote states.
I. Nothing in this Compact shall override a member state’s
decision that participation in an alternative program may be used
in lieu of adverse action.

SECTION 8. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE
AUDIOLOGY AND SPEECH-LANGUAGE
PATHOLOGY COMPACT COMMISSION

A. The Compact member states hereby create and establish a
joint public agency known as the Audiology and Speech-Language
Pathology Compact Commission:
1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact
states.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against
the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court
of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a
waiver of sovereign immunity.
B. Membership, Voting and Meetings
1. Each member state shall have two (2) delegates selected
by that member state’s licensing board. The delegates shall be
current members of the licensing board. One shall be an
audiologist and one shall be a speech-language pathologist.
2. An additional five (5) delegates, who are either a public
member or board administrator from a state licensing board, shall
be chosen by the Executive Committee from a pool of nominees
provided by the Commission at Large.
3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office
as provided by the law of the state from which the delegate is
appointed.
4. The member state board shall fill any vacancy occurring
on the Commission, within 90 days.
5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote with
regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and
shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business
and affairs of the Commission.
-
*SB34*

– 80 –
6. A delegate shall vote in person or by other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates’
participation in meetings by telephone or other means of
communication.
7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the
bylaws.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers and
duties:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish bylaws;
3. Establish a Code of Ethics;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the
bylaws;
5. Meet and take actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact and the bylaws;
6. Promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate
implementation and administration of this Compact. The rules
shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all
member states;
7. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any state
audiology or speech-language pathology licensing board to sue or
be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a member state;
10. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant individuals appropriate
authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and to
establish the Commission’s personnel policies and programs
relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and
other related personnel matters;
11. Accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive,
utilize and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the
Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or
conflict of interest;
12. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations
of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, real,
personal or mixed; provided that at all times the Commission shall
avoid any appearance of impropriety;
13. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or
mixed;
-
*SB34*

– 81 –
14. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
15. Borrow money;
16. Appoint committees, including standing committees
composed of members, and other interested persons as may be
designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
17. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
18. Establish and elect an Executive Committee; and
19. Perform other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact consistent
with the state regulation of audiology and speech-language
pathology licensure and practice.
D. The Executive Committee
The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf
of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact:
1. The Executive Committee shall be composed of ten (10)
members:
a. Seven (7) voting members who are elected by the
Commission from the current membership of the Commission;
b. Two (2) ex-officios, consisting of one nonvoting
member from a recognized national audiology professional
association and one nonvoting member from a recognized
national speech-language pathology association; and
c. One (1) ex-officio, nonvoting member from the
recognized membership organization of the audiology and speech-
language pathology licensing boards.
E. The ex-officio members shall be selected by their
respective organizations.
1. The Commission may remove any member of the
Executive Committee as provided in bylaws.
2. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
3. The Executive Committee shall have the following duties
and responsibilities:
a. Recommend to the entire Commission changes to the
rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees paid by
Compact member states such as annual dues, and any commission
Compact fee charged to licensees for the compact privilege;
b. Ensure Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise;
c. Prepare and recommend the budget;
d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the
Commission;
e. Monitor Compact compliance of member states and
provide compliance reports to the Commission;
f. Establish additional committees as necessary; and
-
*SB34*

– 82 –
g. Other duties as provided in rules or bylaws.
4. Meetings of the Commission
All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of
meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the
rulemaking provisions in Section 10.
5. The Commission or the Executive Committee or other
committees of the Commission may convene in a closed, non-
public meeting if the Commission or Executive Committee or
other committees of the Commission must discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a member state with its
obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or
other matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel
practices and procedures;
c. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial
information that is privileged or confidential;
g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where
disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of
personal privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law
enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of information related to any investigative
reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission
or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact; or
j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or member state statute.
6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant
to this provision, the Commission’s legal counsel or designee shall
certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each
relevant exempting provision.
7. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and
clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall
provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed.
All documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority
-
*SB34*

– 83 –
vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
8. Financing of the Commission
a. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the
payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment,
organization, and ongoing activities.
b. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate
revenue sources, donations, and grants of money, equipment,
supplies, materials, and services.
c. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each member state or impose fees on other
parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the
Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount
sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for
which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate
annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a
formula to be determined by the Commission, which shall
promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.
9. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall
the Commission pledge the credit of any of the member states,
except by and with the authority of the member state.
10. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the
Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and
disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be
audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the
report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the
annual report of the Commission.
F. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any
claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other
civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to protect any person from suit and/or liability for any
damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee or representative of the Commission
-
*SB34*

– 84 –
in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any
actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or
that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable
basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing
herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining
his or her own counsel; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of
the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment
obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that person
had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that
the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.

SECTION 9. DATA SYSTEM

A. The Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, and utilization of a coordinated database and
reporting system containing licensure, adverse action, and
investigative information on all licensed individuals in member
states.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the
contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data set to the
data system on all individuals to whom this Compact is applicable
as required by the rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license or compact privilege;
4. Non-confidential information related to alternative
program participation;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for denial; and
6. Other information that may facilitate the administration
of this Compact, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
C. Investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any
member state shall only be available to other member states.
D. The Commission shall promptly notify all member states
of any adverse action taken against a licensee or an individual
-
*SB34*

– 85 –
applying for a license. Adverse action information pertaining to a
licensee in any member state shall be available to any other
member state.
E. Member states contributing information to the data system
may designate information that may not be shared with the public
without the express permission of the contributing state.
F. Any information submitted to the data system that is
subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the member
state contributing the information shall be removed from the data
system.

SECTION 10. RULEMAKING

A. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Section and the rules
adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding
as of the date specified in each rule or amendment.
B. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states
rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same
manner used to adopt the Compact within 4 years of the date of
adoption of the rule, the rule shall have no further force and effect
in any member state.
C. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a
regular or special meeting of the Commission.
D. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules
by the Commission, and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the
meeting at which the rule shall be considered and voted upon, the
Commission shall file a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly
accessible platform; and
2. On the website of each member state audiology or
speech-language pathology licensing board or other publicly
accessible platform or the publication in which each state would
otherwise publish proposed rules.
E. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date, and location of the meeting in
which the rule shall be considered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the
reason for the proposed rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any
interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit
notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the public
hearing and any written comments.
-
*SB34*

– 86 –
F. Prior to the adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission
shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and
arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
G. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public
hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is
requested by:
1. At least twenty-five (25) persons;
2. A state or federal governmental subdivision or agency;
or
3. An association having at least twenty-five (25) members.
H. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment,
the Commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the
scheduled public hearing. If the hearing is held via electronic
means, the Commission shall publish the mechanism for access to
the electronic hearing.
1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall
notify the executive director of the Commission or other
designated member in writing of their desire to appear and testify
at the hearing not less than five (5) business days before the
scheduled date of the hearing.
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each
person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity
to comment orally or in writing.
3. All hearings shall be recorded. A copy of the recording
shall be made available on request.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the
convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
section.
I. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of
business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not
held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral comments
received.
J. If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing
by interested parties is received, the Commission may proceed with
promulgation of the proposed rule without a public hearing.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members,
take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the
effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record
and the full text of the rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
Commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without
prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided that
the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in
this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as
-
*SB34*

– 87 –
reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an
emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order
to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds; or
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an
administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the
Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or
amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors
in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public
notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any
person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision
may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing
and delivered to the chair of the Commission prior to the end of
the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision shall take
effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the
revision may not take effect without the approval of the
Commission.

SECTION 11. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION,
AND ENFORCEMENT

A. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise
among member states and between member and non-member
states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as
appropriate.
B. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal
action in the United States District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices against a member state in default to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
-
*SB34*

– 88 –
necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of
litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies
of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or state law.

SECTION 12. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR AUDIOLOGY AND
SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY PRACTICE AND
ASSOCIATED RULES, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT

A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which
the Compact statute is enacted into law in the 10th member state.
The provisions, which become effective at that time, shall be
limited to the powers granted to the Commission relating to
assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the
Commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary
to the implementation and administration of the Compact.
B. Any state that joins the Compact subsequent to the
Commission’s initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to the
rules as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law
in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the
Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day
the Compact becomes law in that state.
C. Any member state may withdraw from this Compact by
enacting a statute repealing the same.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until
six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement
of the withdrawing state’s audiology or speech-language
pathology licensing board to comply with the investigative and
adverse action reporting requirements of this act prior to the
effective date of withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any audiology or speech-language pathology
licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a
member state and a non-member state that does not conflict with
the provisions of this Compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the member states. No
amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding
upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all
member states.
-
*SB34*

– 89 –
SECTION 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate
the purposes thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be
severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this
Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any
member state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to
any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid,
the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability
thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall
not be affected thereby. If this Compact shall be held contrary to
the constitution of any member state, the Compact shall remain in
full force and effect as to the remaining member states and in full
force and effect as to the member state affected as to all severable
matters.

SECTION 14. BINDING EFFECT OF
COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

A. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law
of a member state that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
B. All laws in a member state in conflict with the Compact
are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
C. All lawful actions of the Commission, including all rules
and bylaws promulgated by the Commission, are binding upon the
member states.
D. All agreements between the Commission and the member
states are binding in accordance with their terms.
E. In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the
constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member
state, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict
with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.
Sec. 22. NRS 637B.288 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637B.288 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 239.0115 [,] and section 21 of this act, a complaint filed with
the Board, all documents and other information filed with the
complaint and all documents and other information compiled as a
result of an investigation conducted to determine whether to initiate
disciplinary action against a person are confidential, unless the
person submits a written statement to the Board requesting that such
documents and information be made public records.
2. The charging documents filed with the Board to initiate
disciplinary action pursuant to chapter 622A of NRS and all
documents and information considered by the Board when
determining whether to impose discipline are public records.
-
*SB34*

– 90 –
3. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
any other licensing board or any other agency that is investigating a
person, including, without limitation, a law enforcement agency.
Sec. 23. Chapter 640 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Physical Therapy Licensure Compact is hereby ratified
and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining the
Compact, in substantially the form set forth in this section:

PHYSICAL THERAPY LICENSURE COMPACT

SECTION 1. PURPOSE

The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate practice
of physical therapy with the goal of improving public access to
physical therapy services. The practice of physical therapy occurs
in the state where the patient/client is located at the time of the
patient/client encounter. The Compact preserves the regulatory
authority of states to protect public health and safety through the
current system of state licensure.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
1. Increase public access to physical therapy services by
providing for the mutual recognition of other member state
licenses;
2. Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health
and safety;
3. Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating
multi-state physical therapy practice;
4. Support spouses of relocating military members;
5. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and
disciplinary information between member states; and
6. Allow a remote state to hold a provider of services with a
compact privilege in that state accountable to that state’s practice
standards.

SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS

As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the
following definitions shall apply:
1. “Active Duty Military” means full-time duty status in the
active uniformed service of the United States, including members
of the National Guard and Reserve on active duty orders pursuant
to 10 U.S.C. Chapters 1209 and 1211.
-
*SB34*

– 91 –
2. “Adverse Action” means disciplinary action taken by a
physical therapy licensing board based upon misconduct,
unacceptable performance, or a combination of both.
3. “Alternative Program” means a non-disciplinary
monitoring or practice remediation process approved by a physical
therapy licensing board. This includes, but is not limited to,
substance abuse issues.
4. “Compact privilege” means the authorization granted by a
remote state to allow a licensee from another member state to
practice as a physical therapist or work as a physical therapist
assistant in the remote state under its laws and rules. The practice
of physical therapy occurs in the member state where the
patient/client is located at the time of the patient/client encounter.
5. “Continuing competence” means a requirement, as a
condition of license renewal, to provide evidence of participation
in, and/or completion of, educational and professional activities
relevant to practice or area of work.
6. “Data system” means a repository of information about
licensees, including examination, licensure, investigative, compact
privilege, and adverse action.
7. “Encumbered license” means a license that a physical
therapy licensing board has limited in any way.
8. “Executive Board” means a group of directors elected or
appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to
them by, the Commission.
9. “Home state” means the member state that is the licensee’s
primary state of residence.
10. “Investigative information” means information, records,
and documents received or generated by a physical therapy
licensing board pursuant to an investigation.
11. “Jurisprudence Requirement” means the assessment of
an individual’s knowledge of the laws and rules governing the
practice of physical therapy in a state.
12. “Licensee” means an individual who currently holds an
authorization from the state to practice as a physical therapist or
to work as a physical therapist assistant.
13. “Member state” means a state that has enacted the
Compact.
14. “Party state” means any member state in which a licensee
holds a current license or compact privilege or is applying for a
license or compact privilege.
15. “Physical therapist” means an individual who is licensed
by a state to practice physical therapy.
-
*SB34*

– 92 –
16. “Physical therapist assistant” means an individual who is
licensed/certified by a state and who assists the physical therapist
in selected components of physical therapy.
17. “Physical therapy,” “physical therapy practice,” and “the
practice of physical therapy” mean the care and services provided
by or under the direction and supervision of a licensed physical
therapist.
18. “Physical Therapy Compact Commission” or
“Commission” means the national administrative body whose
membership consists of all states that have enacted the Compact.
19. “Physical therapy licensing board” or “licensing board”
means the agency of a state that is responsible for the licensing
and regulation of physical therapists and physical therapist
assistants.
20. “Remote State” means a member state other than the
home state, where a licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise
the compact privilege.
21. “Rule” means a regulation, principle, or directive
promulgated by the Commission that has the force of law.
22. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or
territory of the United States of America that regulates the practice
of physical therapy.

SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT

A. To participate in the Compact, a state must:
1. Participate fully in the Commission’s data system,
including using the Commission’s unique identifier as defined in
rules;
2. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and
investigating complaints about licensees;
3. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of
the Compact and rules, of any adverse action or the availability of
investigative information regarding a licensee;
4. Fully implement a criminal background check
requirement, within a time frame established by rule, by receiving
the results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search
on criminal background checks and use the results in making
licensure decisions in accordance with Section 3.B.;
5. Comply with the rules of the Commission;
6. Utilize a recognized national examination as a
requirement for licensure pursuant to the rules of the
Commission; and
7. Have continuing competence requirements as a
condition for license renewal.
-
*SB34*

– 93 –
B. Upon adoption of this statute, the member state shall have
the authority to obtain biometric-based information from each
physical therapy licensure applicant and submit this information
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a criminal background
check in accordance with 28 U.S.C. § 534 and 42 U.S.C. § 14616.
C. A member state shall grant the compact privilege to a
licensee holding a valid unencumbered license in another member
state in accordance with the terms of the Compact and rules.
D. Member states may charge a fee for granting a compact
privilege.

SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE

A. To exercise the compact privilege under the terms and
provisions of the Compact, the licensee shall:
1. Hold a license in the home state;
2. Have no encumbrance on any state license;
3. Be eligible for a compact privilege in any member state
in accordance with Section 4D, G and H;
4. Have not had any adverse action against any license or
compact privilege within the previous 2 years;
5. Notify the Commission that the licensee is seeking the
compact privilege within a remote state(s);
6. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the
compact privilege;
7. Meet any jurisprudence requirements established by the
remote state(s) in which the licensee is seeking a compact
privilege; and
8. Report to the Commission adverse action taken by any
non-member state within 30 days from the date the adverse action
is taken.
B. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date of
the home license. The licensee must comply with the requirements
of Section 4.A. to maintain the compact privilege in the remote
state.
C. A licensee providing physical therapy in a remote state
under the compact privilege shall function within the laws and
regulations of the remote state.
D. A licensee providing physical therapy in a remote state is
subject to that state’s regulatory authority. A remote state may, in
accordance with due process and that state’s laws, remove a
licensee’s compact privilege in the remote state for a specific
period of time, impose fines, and/or take any other necessary
actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens. The licensee
-
*SB34*

– 94 –
is not eligible for a compact privilege in any state until the specific
time for removal has passed and all fines are paid.
E. If a home state license is encumbered, the licensee shall
lose the compact privilege in any remote state until the following
occur:
1. The home state license is no longer encumbered; and
2. Two years have elapsed from the date of the adverse
action.
F. Once an encumbered license in the home state is restored
to good standing, the licensee must meet the requirements of
Section 4A to obtain a compact privilege in any remote state.
G. If a licensee’s compact privilege in any remote state is
removed, the individual shall lose the compact privilege in any
remote state until the following occur:
1. The specific period of time for which the compact
privilege was removed has ended;
2. All fines have been paid; and
3. Two years have elapsed from the date of the adverse
action.
H. Once the requirements of Section 4G have been met, the
license must meet the requirements in Section 4A to obtain a
compact privilege in a remote state.

SECTION 5. ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY
PERSONNEL OR THEIR SPOUSES

A licensee who is active duty military or is the spouse of an
individual who is active duty military may designate one of the
following as the home state:
A. Home of record;
B. Permanent Change of Station (PCS); or
C. State of current residence if it is different than the PCS
state or home of record.

SECTION 6. ADVERSE ACTIONS

A. A home state shall have exclusive power to impose adverse
action against a license issued by the home state.
B. A home state may take adverse action based on the
investigative information of a remote state, so long as the home
state follows its own procedures for imposing adverse action.
C. Nothing in this Compact shall override a member state’s
decision that participation in an alternative program may be used
in lieu of adverse action and that such participation shall remain
non-public if required by the member state’s laws. Member states
-
*SB34*

– 95 –
must require licensees who enter any alternative programs in lieu
of discipline to agree not to practice in any other member state
during the term of the alternative program without prior
authorization from such other member state.
D. Any member state may investigate actual or alleged
violations of the statutes and rules authorizing the practice of
physical therapy in any other member state in which a physical
therapist or physical therapist assistant holds a license or compact
privilege.
E. A remote state shall have the authority to:
1. Take adverse actions as set forth in Section 4.D. against
a licensee’s compact privilege in the state;
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations
that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and the
production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a physical therapy
licensing board in a party state for the attendance and testimony
of witnesses, and/or the production of evidence from another party
state, shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of
competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of
that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending
before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel
expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes
of the state where the witnesses and/or evidence are located; and
3. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the
licensee the costs of investigations and disposition of cases
resulting from any adverse action taken against that licensee.
F. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a member state by
its respective physical therapy practice act or other applicable state
law, a member state may participate with other member states in
joint investigations of licensees.
2. Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual
investigation initiated under the Compact.

SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE PHYSICAL
THERAPY COMPACT COMMISSION

A. The Compact member states hereby create and establish a
joint public agency known as the Physical Therapy Compact
Commission:
1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact
states.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against
the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court
-
*SB34*

– 96 –
of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a
waiver of sovereign immunity.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1)
delegate selected by that member state’s licensing board.
2. The delegate shall be a current member of the licensing
board, who is a physical therapist, physical therapist assistant,
public member, or the board administrator.
3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office
as provided by the law of the state from which the delegate is
appointed.
4. The member state board shall fill any vacancy occurring
in the Commission.
5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote with
regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and
shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business
and affairs of the Commission.
6. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates’
participation in meetings by telephone or other means of
communication.
7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the
bylaws.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers and
duties:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish bylaws;
3. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the
bylaws;
4. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact and the bylaws;
5. Promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate
implementation and administration of this Compact. The rules
shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all
member states;
6. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any state
physical therapy licensing board to sue or be sued under
applicable law shall not be affected;
7. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
-
*SB34*

– 97 –
8. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a member state;
9. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate
authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and to
establish the Commission’s personnel policies and programs
relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and
other related personnel matters;
10. Accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive,
utilize and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the
Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or
conflict of interest;
11. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations
of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, real,
personal or mixed; provided that at all times the Commission shall
avoid any appearance of impropriety;
12. Sell convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or
mixed;
13. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
14. Borrow money;
15. Appoint committees, including standing committees
composed of members, state regulators, state legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other
interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the
bylaws;
16. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
17. Establish and elect an Executive Board; and
18. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact consistent
with the state regulation of physical therapy licensure and
practice.
D. The Executive Board
The Executive Board shall have the power to act on behalf of
the Commission according to the terms of this Compact.
1. The Executive Board shall be composed of nine
members:
a. Seven voting members who are elected by the
Commission from the current membership of the Commission;
b. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from the
recognized national physical therapy professional association; and
-
*SB34*

– 98 –
c. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from the
recognized membership organization of the physical therapy
licensing boards.
2. The ex-officio members will be selected by their
respective organizations.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the
Executive Board as provided in bylaws.
4. The Executive Board shall meet at least annually.
5. The Executive Board shall have the following Duties and
responsibilities:
a. Recommend to the entire Commission changes to the
rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees paid by
Compact member states such as annual dues, and any commission
Compact fee charged to licensees for the compact privilege;
b. Ensure Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise;
c. Prepare and recommend the budget;
d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the
Commission;
e. Monitor Compact compliance of member states and
provide compliance reports to the Commission;
f. Establish additional committees as necessary; and
g. Other duties as provided in rules or bylaws.
E. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, and public
notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required
under the rulemaking provisions in Section 9.
2. The Commission or the Executive Board or other
committees of the Commission may convene in a closed, non-
public meeting if the Commission or Executive Board or other
committees of the Commission must discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a member state with its
obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or
other matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel
practices and procedures;
c. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial
information that is privileged or confidential;
-
*SB34*

– 99 –
g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where
disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of
personal privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law
enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of information related to any investigative
reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission
or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact; or
j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or member state statute.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant
to this provision, the Commission’s legal counsel or designee shall
certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each
relevant exempting provision.
4. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and
clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall
provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed.
All documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority
vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
F. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment
of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and
ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate
revenue sources, donations, and grants of money, equipment,
supplies, materials, and services.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each member state or impose fees on other
parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the
Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount
sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for
which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate
annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a
formula to be determined by the Commission, which shall
promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall
the Commission pledge the credit of any of the member states,
except by and with the authority of the member state.
-
*SB34*

– 100 –
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the
Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and
disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be
audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the
report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the
annual report of the Commission.
G. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any
claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other
civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to protect any such person from suit and/or liability for
any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee or representative of the Commission
in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any
actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or
that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable
basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing
herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining
his or her own counsel; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of
the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment
obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities,
provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not
result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
-
*SB34*

– 101 –
SECTION 8. DATA SYSTEM

A. The Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, and utilization of a coordinated database and
reporting system containing licensure, adverse action, and
investigative information on all licensed individuals in member
states.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the
contrary a member state shall submit a uniform data set to the
data system on all individuals to whom this Compact is applicable
as required by the rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license or compact privilege;
4. Non-confidential information related to alternative
program participation;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for such denial; and
6. Other information that may facilitate the administration
of this Compact, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
C. Investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any
member state will only be available to other party states.
D. The Commission shall promptly notify all member states
of any adverse action taken against a licensee or an individual
applying for a license. Adverse action information pertaining to a
licensee in any member state will be available to any other
member state.
E. Member states contributing information to the data system
may designate information that may not be shared with the public
without the express permission of the contributing state.
F. Any information submitted to the data system that is
subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the member
state contributing the information shall be removed from the data
system.

SECTION 9. RULEMAKING

A. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Section and the rules
adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding
as of the date specified in each rule or amendment.
B. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states
rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same
manner used to adopt the Compact within 4 years of the date of
-
*SB34*

– 102 –
adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force
and effect in any member state.
C. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a
regular or special meeting of the Commission.
D. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules
by the Commission, and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the
meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted upon, the
Commission shall file a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly
accessible platform; and
2. On the website of each member state physical therapy
licensing board or other publicly accessible platform or the
publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed
rules.
E. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date, and location of the meeting in
which the rule will be considered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the
reason for the proposed rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any
interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit
notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the public
hearing and any written comments.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall
allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, and
arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
G. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public
hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is
requested by:
1. At least twenty-five (25) persons;
2. A state or federal governmental subdivision or agency;
or
3. An association having at least twenty-five (25) members.
H. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment,
the Commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the
scheduled public hearing. If the hearing is held via electronic
means, the Commission shall publish the mechanism for access to
the electronic hearing.
1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall
notify the executive director of the Commission or other
designated member in writing of their desire to appear and testify
at the hearing not less than five (5) business days before the
scheduled date of the hearing.
-
*SB34*

– 103 –
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each
person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity
to comment orally or in writing.
3. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording
will be made available on request.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the
convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
section.
I. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of
business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not
held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral comments
received.
J. If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing
by interested parties is received, the Commission may proceed with
promulgation of the proposed rule without a public hearing.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members,
take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the
effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record
and the full text of the rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
Commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without
prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided that
the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in
this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an
emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order
to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an
administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the
Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or
amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors
in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public
notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any
person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision
may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing,
and delivered to the chair of the Commission prior to the end of
-
*SB34*

– 104 –
the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take
effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the
revision may not take effect without the approval of the
Commission.

SECTION 10. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION,
AND ENFORCEMENT

A. Oversight
1. The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state
government in each member state shall enforce this Compact and
take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the
Compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of this Compact
and the rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as
statutory law.
2. All courts shall take judicial notice of the Compact and
the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member
state pertaining to the subject matter of this Compact which may
affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the Commission.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing to
intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide
service of process to the Commission shall render a judgment or
order void as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated
rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a member state has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities
under this Compact or the promulgated rules, the Commission
shall:
a. Provide written notice to the defaulting state and
other member states of the nature of the default, the proposed
means of curing the default and/or any other action to be taken by
the Commission; and
b. Provide remedial training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
2. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the
defaulting state may be terminated from the Compact upon an
affirmative vote of a majority of the member states, and all rights,
privileges and benefits conferred by this Compact may be
terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the
default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or
liabilities incurred during the period of default.
3. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be
imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have
-
*SB34*

– 105 –
been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be
given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and
minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, and each of
the member states.
4. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the
effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
beyond the effective date of termination.
5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a
state that is found to be in default or that has been terminated
from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the
Commission and the defaulting state.
6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the
Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District
of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing member shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
C. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise
among member states and between member and non-member
states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as
appropriate.
D. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal
action in the United States District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices against a member state in default to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies
of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or state law.
-
*SB34*

– 106 –
SECTION 11. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF
THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR PHYSICAL
THERAPY PRACTICE AND ASSOCIATED RULES,
WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT

A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which
the Compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state.
The provisions, which become effective at that time, shall be
limited to the powers granted to the Commission relating to
assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the
Commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary
to the implementation and administration of the Compact.
B. Any state that joins the Compact subsequent to the
Commission’s initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to the
rules as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law
in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the
Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day
the Compact becomes law in that state.
C. Any member state may withdraw from this Compact by
enacting a statute repealing the same.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until
six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement
of the withdrawing state’s physical therapy licensing board to
comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting
requirements of this act prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any physical therapy licensure agreement or
other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a
non-member state that does not conflict with the provisions of this
Compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the member states. No
amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding
upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all
member states.

SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate
the purposes thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be
severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this
Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party
state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any
government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the
validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability
-
*SB34*

– 107 –
thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall
not be affected thereby. If this Compact shall be held contrary to
the constitution of any party state, the Compact shall remain in
full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full
force and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable
matters.
Sec. 24. NRS 640.075 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640.075 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 239.0115 [,] and section 23 of this act, a complaint filed with
the Board, all documents and other information filed with the
complaint and all documents and other information compiled as a
result of an investigation conducted to determine whether to initiate
disciplinary action against a person are confidential, unless the
person submits a written statement to the Board requesting that such
documents and information be made public records.
2. The charging documents filed with the Board to initiate
disciplinary action pursuant to chapter 622A of NRS and all
documents and information considered by the Board when
determining whether to impose discipline are public records.
3. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
any other licensing board or any other agency that is investigating a
person, including, without limitation, a law enforcement agency.
4. An order that imposes discipline and the findings of fact and
conclusions of law supporting that order are public records.
Sec. 25. NRS 640.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640.110 1. The Board shall license as a physical therapist or
physical therapist assistant each applicant who proves to the
satisfaction of the Board his or her qualifications for licensure.
2. The Board shall issue to each applicant who proves to the
satisfaction of the Board his or her qualification for licensure:
(a) As a physical therapist, a license as a physical therapist. The
license authorizes the applicant to represent himself or herself as a
licensed physical therapist and to practice physical therapy in the
State of Nevada subject to the conditions and limitations of this
chapter.
(b) As a physical therapist assistant, a license as a physical
therapist assistant. The license authorizes the applicant to represent
himself or herself as a licensed physical therapist assistant and to
practice as a licensed physical therapist assistant subject to the
conditions and limitations of this chapter.
3. Each physical therapist shall display his or her current
license or proof that he or she is authorized to practice in this
State under the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact enacted by
-
*SB34*

– 108 –
section 23 of this act, as applicable, in a location which is
accessible to the public.
4. The Board may charge a fee, not to exceed $25, to change a
name on a license.
5. A license as a physical therapist assistant remains valid
while a supervising physical therapist continues to supervise the
physical therapist assistant.
Sec. 26. Chapter 640A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact is hereby
ratified and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining
the Compact, in substantially the form set forth in this section:
OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY LICENSURE COMPACT

SECTION 1. PURPOSE

The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate practice
of Occupational Therapy with the goal of improving public access
to Occupational Therapy services. The Practice of Occupational
Therapy occurs in the State where the patient/client is located at
the time of the patient/client encounter. The Compact preserves
the regulatory authority of States to protect public health and
safety through the current system of State licensure.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
A. Increase public access to Occupational Therapy services
by providing for the mutual recognition of other Member State
licenses;
B. Enhance the States’ ability to protect the public’s health
and safety;
C. Encourage the cooperation of Member States in
regulating multi-State Occupational Therapy Practice;
D. Support spouses of relocating military members;
E. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and
disciplinary information between Member States;
F. Allow a Remote State to hold a provider of services with a
Compact Privilege in that State accountable to that State’s
practice standards; and
G. Facilitate the use of Telehealth technology in order to
increase access to Occupational Therapy services.

SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS

As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the
following definitions shall apply:
-
*SB34*

– 109 –
A. “Active Duty Military” means full-time duty status in the
active uniformed service of the United States, including members
of the National Guard and Reserve on active duty orders pursuant
to 10 U.S.C. Chapter 1209 and 10 U.S.C. Chapter 1211.
B. “Adverse Action” means any administrative, civil,
equitable, or criminal action permitted by a State’s laws which is
imposed by a Licensing Board or other authority against an
Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy Assistant,
including actions against an individual’s license or Compact
Privilege such as censure, revocation, suspension, probation,
monitoring of the Licensee, or restriction on the Licensee’s
practice.
C. “Alternative Program” means a non-disciplinary
monitoring process approved by an Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board.
D. “Compact Privilege” means the authorization, which is
equivalent to a license, granted by a Remote State to allow a
Licensee from another Member State to practice as an
Occupational Therapist or practice as an Occupational Therapy
Assistant in the Remote State under its laws and rules. The
Practice of Occupational Therapy occurs in the Member State
where the patient/client is located at the time of the patient/client
encounter.
E. “Continuing Competence/Education” means a
requirement, as a condition of license renewal, to provide evidence
of participation in, and/or completion of, educational and
professional activities relevant to practice or area of work.
F. “Current Significant Investigative Information” means
Investigative Information that a Licensing Board, after an inquiry
or investigation that includes notification and an opportunity for
the Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy Assistant to
respond, if required by State law, has reason to believe is not
groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor
infraction.
G. “Data System” means a repository of information about
Licensees, including but not limited to license status, Investigative
Information, Compact Privileges, and Adverse Actions.
H. “Encumbered License” means a license in which an
Adverse Action restricts the Practice of Occupational Therapy by
the Licensee or said Adverse Action has been reported to the
National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB).
I. “Executive Committee” means a group of directors elected
or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to
them by, the Commission.
-
*SB34*

– 110 –
J. “Home State” means the Member State that is the
Licensee’s Primary State of Residence.
K. “Impaired Practitioner” means individuals whose
professional practice is adversely affected by substance abuse,
addiction, or other health-related conditions.
L. “Investigative Information” means information, records,
and/or documents received or generated by an Occupational
Therapy Licensing Board pursuant to an investigation.
M. “Jurisprudence Requirement” means the assessment of
an individual’s knowledge of the laws and rules governing the
Practice of Occupational Therapy in a State.
N. “Licensee” means an individual who currently holds an
authorization from the State to practice as an Occupational
Therapist or as an Occupational Therapy Assistant.
O. “Member State” means a State that has enacted the
Compact.
P. “Occupational Therapist” means an individual who is
licensed by a State to practice Occupational Therapy.
Q. “Occupational Therapy Assistant” means an individual
who is licensed by a State to assist in the Practice of Occupational
Therapy.
R. “Occupational Therapy,” “Occupational Therapy
Practice,” and the “Practice of Occupational Therapy” mean the
care and services provided by an Occupational Therapist or an
Occupational Therapy Assistant as set forth in the Member State’s
statutes and regulations.
S. “Occupational Therapy Compact Commission” or
“Commission” means the national administrative body whose
membership consists of all States that have enacted the Compact.
T. “Occupational Therapy Licensing Board” or “Licensing
Board” means the agency of a State that is authorized to license
and regulate Occupational Therapists and Occupational Therapy
Assistants.
U. “Primary State of Residence” means the state (also known
as the Home State) in which an Occupational Therapist or
Occupational Therapy Assistant who is not Active Duty Military
declares a primary residence for legal purposes as verified by:
driver’s license, federal income tax return, lease, deed, mortgage
or voter registration or other verifying documentation as further
defined by Commission Rules.
V. “Remote State” means a Member State other than the
Home State, where a Licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise
the Compact Privilege.
W. “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by the
Commission that has the force of law.
-
*SB34*

– 111 –
X. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or
territory of the United States of America that regulates the
Practice of Occupational Therapy.
Y. “Single-State License” means an Occupational Therapist
or Occupational Therapy Assistant license issued by a Member
State that authorizes practice only within the issuing State and
does not include a Compact Privilege in any other Member State.
Z. “Telehealth” means the application of telecommunication
technology to deliver Occupational Therapy services for
assessment, intervention and/or consultation.

SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT

A. To participate in the Compact, a Member State shall:
1. License Occupational Therapists and Occupational
Therapy Assistants;
2. Participate fully in the Commission’s Data System,
including but not limited to using the Commission’s unique
identifier as defined in Rules of the Commission;
3. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and
investigating complaints about Licensees;
4. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of
the Compact and Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability
of Investigative Information regarding a Licensee;
5. Implement or utilize procedures for considering the
criminal history records of applicants for an initial Compact
Privilege. These procedures shall include the submission of
fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants
for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal history record
information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the
agency responsible for retaining that State’s criminal records;
a. A Member State shall, within a time frame established
by the Commission, require a criminal background check for a
Licensee seeking/applying for a Compact Privilege whose Primary
State of Residence is that Member State, by receiving the results of
the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal record search, and
shall use the results in making licensure decisions.
b. Communication between a Member State, the
Commission and among Member States regarding the verification
of eligibility for licensure through the Compact shall not include
any information received from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation relating to a federal criminal records check
performed by a Member State under Public Law 92-544.
6. Comply with the Rules of the Commission;
-
*SB34*

– 112 –
7. Utilize only a recognized national examination as a
requirement for licensure pursuant to the Rules of the
Commission; and
8. Have Continuing Competence/Education requirements
as a condition for license renewal.
B. A Member State shall grant the Compact Privilege to a
Licensee holding a valid unencumbered license in another
Member State in accordance with the terms of the Compact and
Rules.
C. Member States may charge a fee for granting a Compact
Privilege.
D. A Member State shall provide for the State’s delegate to
attend all Occupational Therapy Compact Commission meetings.
E. Individuals not residing in a Member State shall continue
to be able to apply for a Member State’s Single-State License as
provided under the laws of each Member State. However, the
Single-State License granted to these individuals shall not be
recognized as granting the Compact Privilege in any other
Member State.
F. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements
established by a Member State for the issuance of a Single-State
License.

SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE

A. To exercise the Compact Privilege under the terms and
provisions of the Compact, the Licensee shall:
1. Hold a license in the Home State;
2. Have a valid United States Social Security Number or
National Practitioner Identification number;
3. Have no encumbrance on any State license;
4. Be eligible for a Compact Privilege in any Member State
in accordance with Section 4D, F, G, and H;
5. Have paid all fines and completed all requirements
resulting from any Adverse Action against any license or Compact
Privilege, and two years have elapsed from the date of such
completion;
6. Notify the Commission that the Licensee is seeking the
Compact Privilege within a Remote State(s);
7. Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, for the
Compact Privilege;
8. Complete a criminal background check in accordance
with Section 3A(5);
-
*SB34*

– 113 –
a. The Licensee shall be responsible for the payment of
any fee associated with the completion of a criminal background
check.
9. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirements established by the
Remote State(s) in which the Licensee is seeking a Compact
Privilege; and
10. Report to the Commission Adverse Action taken by any
non-Member State within 30 days from the date the Adverse
Action is taken.
B. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration date of
the Home State license. The Licensee must comply with the
requirements of Section 4A to maintain the Compact Privilege in
the Remote State.
C. A Licensee providing Occupational Therapy in a Remote
State under the Compact Privilege shall function within the laws
and regulations of the Remote State.
D. Occupational Therapy Assistants practicing in a Remote
State shall be supervised by an Occupational Therapist licensed or
holding a Compact Privilege in that Remote State.
E. A Licensee providing Occupational Therapy in a Remote
State is subject to that State’s regulatory authority. A Remote State
may, in accordance with due process and that State’s laws, remove
a Licensee’s Compact Privilege in the Remote State for a specific
period of time, impose fines, and/or take any other necessary
actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens. The Licensee
may be ineligible for a Compact Privilege in any State until the
specific time for removal has passed and all fines are paid.
F. If a Home State license is encumbered, the Licensee shall
lose the Compact Privilege in any Remote State until the following
occur:
1. The Home State license is no longer encumbered; and
2. Two years have elapsed from the date on which the
Home State license is no longer encumbered in accordance with
Section 4(F)(1).
G. Once an Encumbered License in the Home State is
restored to good standing, the Licensee must meet the
requirements of Section 4A to obtain a Compact Privilege in any
Remote State.
H. If a Licensee’s Compact Privilege in any Remote State is
removed, the individual may lose the Compact Privilege in any
other Remote State until the following occur:
1. The specific period of time for which the Compact
Privilege was removed has ended;
2. All fines have been paid and all conditions have been
met;
-
*SB34*

– 114 –
3. Two years have elapsed from the date of completing
requirements for 4(H)(1) and (2); and
4. The Compact Privileges are reinstated by the
Commission, and the compact Data System is updated to reflect
reinstatement.
I. If a Licensee’s Compact Privilege in any Remote State is
removed due to an erroneous charge, privileges shall be restored
through the compact Data System.
J. Once the requirements of Section 4H have been met, the
Licensee must meet the requirements in Section 4A to obtain a
Compact Privilege in a Remote State.

SECTION 5. OBTAINING A NEW HOME STATE LICENSE
BY VIRTUE OF COMPACT PRIVILEGE

A. An Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy
Assistant may hold a Home State license, which allows for
Compact Privileges in Member States, in only one Member State
at a time.
B. If an Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy
Assistant changes Primary State of Residence by moving between
two Member States:
1. The Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy
Assistant shall file an application for obtaining a new Home State
license by virtue of a Compact Privilege, pay all applicable fees,
and notify the current and new Home State in accordance with
applicable Rules adopted by the Commission.
2. Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new Home
State license by virtue of compact privilege, the new Home State
shall verify that the Occupational Therapist or Occupational
Therapy Assistant meets the pertinent criteria outlined in Section
4 via the Data System, without need for primary source
verification except for:
a. an FBI fingerprint based criminal background check
if not previously performed or updated pursuant to applicable
Rules adopted by the Commission in accordance with Public
Law 92-544;
b. other criminal background check as required by the
new Home State; and
c. submission of any requisite Jurisprudence
Requirements of the new Home State.
3. The former Home State shall convert the former Home
State license into a Compact Privilege once the new Home State
has activated the new Home State license in accordance with
applicable Rules adopted by the Commission.
-
*SB34*

– 115 –
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if
the Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy Assistant
cannot meet the criteria in Section 4, the new Home State shall
apply its requirements for issuing a new Single-State License.
5. The Occupational Therapist or the Occupational
Therapy Assistant shall pay all applicable fees to the new Home
State in order to be issued a new Home State license.
C. If an Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy
Assistant changes Primary State of Residence by moving from a
Member State to a non-Member State, or from a non-Member
State to a Member State, the State criteria shall apply for issuance
of a Single-State License in the new State.
D. Nothing in this compact shall interfere with a Licensee’s
ability to hold a Single-State License in multiple States; however,
for the purposes of this compact, a Licensee shall have only one
Home State license.
E. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements
established by a Member State for the issuance of a Single-State
License.

SECTION 6. ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY
PERSONNEL OR THEIR SPOUSES

A. Active Duty Military personnel, or their spouses, shall
designate a Home State where the individual has a current license
in good standing. The individual may retain the Home State
designation during the period the service member is on active
duty. Subsequent to designating a Home State, the individual shall
only change their Home State through application for licensure in
the new State or through the process described in Section 5.

SECTION 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS

A. A Home State shall have exclusive power to impose
Adverse Action against an Occupational Therapist’s or
Occupational Therapy Assistant’s license issued by the Home
State.
B. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, a
Remote State shall have the authority, in accordance with existing
State due process law, to:
1. Take Adverse Action against an Occupational
Therapist’s or Occupational Therapy Assistant’s Compact
Privilege within that Member State.
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations
that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as
-
*SB34*

– 116 –
the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a Licensing
Board in a Member State for the attendance and testimony of
witnesses or the production of evidence from another Member
State shall be enforced in the latter State by any court of
competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of
that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending
before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel
expenses, mileage and other fees required by the service statutes of
the State in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
C. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home State
shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received
from a Member State as it would if the conduct had occurred
within the Home State. In so doing, the Home State shall apply its
own State laws to determine appropriate action.
D. The Home State shall complete any pending investigations
of an Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy Assistant
who changes Primary State of Residence during the course of the
investigations. The Home State, where the investigations were
initiated, shall also have the authority to take appropriate action(s)
and shall promptly report the conclusions of the investigations to
the OT Compact Commission Data System. The Occupational
Therapy Compact Commission Data System administrator shall
promptly notify the new Home State of any Adverse Actions.
E. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may
recover from the affected Occupational Therapist or Occupational
Therapy Assistant the costs of investigations and disposition of
cases resulting from any Adverse Action taken against that
Occupational Therapist or Occupational Therapy Assistant.
F. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on the
factual findings of the Remote State, provided that the Member
State follows its own procedures for taking the Adverse Action.
G. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by
its respective State Occupational Therapy laws and regulations or
other applicable State law, any Member State may participate with
other Member States in joint investigations of Licensees.
2. Member States shall share any investigative, litigation, or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual
investigation initiated under the Compact.
H. If an Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against
an Occupational Therapist’s or Occupational Therapy Assistant’s
license, the Occupational Therapist’s or Occupational Therapy
Assistant’s Compact Privilege in all other Member States shall be
deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the
State license. All Home State disciplinary orders that impose
-
*SB34*

– 117 –
Adverse Action against an Occupational Therapist’s or
Occupational Therapy Assistant’s license shall include a
Statement that the Occupational Therapist’s or Occupational
Therapy Assistant’s Compact Privilege is deactivated in all
Member States during the pendency of the order.
I. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall promptly
notify the administrator of the Data System. The administrator of
the Data System shall promptly notify the Home State of any
Adverse Actions by Remote States.
J. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State’s
decision that participation in an Alternative Program may be used
in lieu of Adverse Action.

SECTION 8. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE OCCUPATIONAL
THERAPY COMPACT COMMISSION

A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a
joint public agency known as the Occupational Therapy Compact
Commission:
1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact
States.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against
the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court
of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a
waiver of sovereign immunity.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1)
delegate selected by that Member State’s Licensing Board.
2. The delegate shall be either:
a. A current member of the Licensing Board, who is an
Occupational Therapist, Occupational Therapy Assistant, or
public member; or
b. An administrator of the Licensing Board.
3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office
as provided by the law of the State from which the delegate is
appointed.
4. The Member State board shall fill any vacancy occurring
in the Commission within 90 days.
5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote with
regard to the promulgation of Rules and creation of bylaws and
shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business
-
*SB34*

– 118 –
and affairs of the Commission. A delegate shall vote in person or
by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may
provide for delegates’ participation in meetings by telephone or
other means of communication.
6. The Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the
bylaws.
7. The Commission shall establish by Rule a term of office
for delegates.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers and
duties:
1. Establish a Code of Ethics for the Commission;
2. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
3. Establish bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the
bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact and the bylaws;
6. Promulgate uniform Rules to facilitate and coordinate
implementation and administration of this Compact. The Rules
shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all
Member States;
7. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any State
Occupational Therapy Licensing Board to sue or be sued under
applicable law shall not be affected;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a Member State;
10. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate
authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and establish
the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to
conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related
personnel matters;
11. Accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and receive,
utilize and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the
Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or
conflict of interest;
12. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations
of, or otherwise own, hold, improve or use, any property, real,
personal or mixed; provided that at all times the Commission shall
avoid any appearance of impropriety;
-
*SB34*

– 119 –
13. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or
mixed;
14. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
15. Borrow money;
16. Appoint committees, including standing committees
composed of members, State regulators, State legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other
interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the
bylaws;
17. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
18. Establish and elect an Executive Committee; and
19. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact consistent
with the State regulation of Occupational Therapy licensure and
practice.
D. The Executive Committee
The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf
of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact.
1. The Executive Committee shall be composed of nine
members:
a. Seven voting members who are elected by the
Commission from the current membership of the Commission;
b. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized
national Occupational Therapy professional association; and
c. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a recognized
national Occupational Therapy certification organization.
2. The ex-officio members will be selected by their
respective organizations.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the
Executive Committee as provided in bylaws.
4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
5. The Executive Committee shall have the following Duties
and responsibilities:
a. Recommend to the entire Commission changes to the
Rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees paid by
Compact Member States such as annual dues, and any
Commission Compact fee charged to Licensees for the Compact
Privilege;
b. Ensure Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise;
c. Prepare and recommend the budget;
d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the
Commission;
-
*SB34*

– 120 –
e. Monitor Compact compliance of Member States and
provide compliance reports to the Commission;
f. Establish additional committees as necessary; and
g. Perform other duties as provided in Rules or bylaws.
E. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, and public
notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required
under the Rulemaking provisions in Section 10.
2. The Commission or the Executive Committee or other
committees of the Commission may convene in a closed, non-
public meeting if the Commission or Executive Committee or
other committees of the Commission must discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its
obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or
other matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel
practices and procedures;
c. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial
information that is privileged or confidential;
g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where
disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of
personal privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law
enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of information related to any investigative
reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission
or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact; or
j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or Member State statute.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant
to this provision, the Commission’s legal counsel or designee shall
certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each
relevant exempting provision.
4. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and
clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall
provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed.
-
*SB34*

– 121 –
All documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority
vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
F. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment
of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and
ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate
revenue sources, donations, and grants of money, equipment,
supplies, materials, and services.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each Member State or impose fees on other
parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the
Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount
sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved by the
Commission each year for which revenue is not provided by other
sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be
allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the
Commission, which shall promulgate a Rule binding upon all
Member States.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall
the Commission pledge the credit of any of the Member States,
except by and with the authority of the Member State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the
Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and
disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be
audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the
report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the
annual report of the Commission.
G. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any
claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other
civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to protect any such person from suit and/or liability for
-
*SB34*

– 122 –
any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee, or representative of the Commission
in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any
actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or
that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable
basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing
herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining
his or her own counsel; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of
the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment
obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities,
provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not
result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.

SECTION 9. DATA SYSTEM

A. The Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, and utilization of a coordinated database and
reporting system containing licensure, Adverse Action, and
Investigative Information on all licensed individuals in Member
States.
B. A Member State shall submit a uniform data set to the
Data System on all individuals to whom this Compact is applicable
(utilizing a unique identifier) as required by the Rules of the
Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a license or Compact Privilege;
4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative
Program participation;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for such denial;
-
*SB34*

– 123 –
6. Other information that may facilitate the administration
of this Compact, as determined by the Rules of the Commission;
and
7. Current Significant Investigative Information.
C. Current Significant Investigative Information and other
Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any Member
State will only be available to other Member States.
D. The Commission shall promptly notify all Member States
of any Adverse Action taken against a Licensee or an individual
applying for a license. Adverse Action information pertaining to a
Licensee in any Member State will be available to any other
Member State.
E. Member States contributing information to the Data
System may designate information that may not be shared with the
public without the express permission of the contributing State.
F. Any information submitted to the Data System that is
subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the Member
State contributing the information shall be removed from the Data
System.

SECTION 10. RULEMAKING

A. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Section and the Rules
adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding
as of the date specified in each Rule or amendment.
B. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in
order to effectively and efficiently achieve the purposes of the
Compact. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the
Commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is
beyond the scope of the purposes of the Compact, or the powers
granted hereunder, then such an action by the Commission shall
be invalid and have no force and effect.
C. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States
rejects a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same
manner used to adopt the Compact within 4 years of the date of
adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force
and effect in any Member State.
D. Rules or amendments to the Rules shall be adopted at a
regular or special meeting of the Commission.
E. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final Rule or
Rules by the Commission, and at least thirty (30) days in advance
of the meeting at which the Rule will be considered and voted
upon, the Commission shall file a Notice of Proposed
Rulemaking:
-
*SB34*

– 124 –
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly
accessible platform; and
2. On the website of each Member State Occupational
Therapy Licensing Board or other publicly accessible platform or
the publication in which each State would otherwise publish
proposed Rules.
F. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date, and location of the meeting in
which the Rule will be considered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed Rule or amendment and the
reason for the proposed Rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any
interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit
notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the public
hearing and any written comments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission
shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, and
arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
H. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public
hearing before it adopts a Rule or amendment if a hearing is
requested by:
1. At least twenty five (25) persons;
2. A State or federal governmental subdivision or agency;
or
3. An association or organization having at least twenty five
(25) members.
I. If a hearing is held on the proposed Rule or amendment,
the Commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the
scheduled public hearing. If the hearing is held via electronic
means, the Commission shall publish the mechanism for access to
the electronic hearing.
1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall
notify the executive director of the Commission or other
designated member in writing of their desire to appear and testify
at the hearing not less than five (5) business days before the
scheduled date of the hearing.
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each
person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity
to comment orally or in writing.
3. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording
will be made available on request.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the
-
*SB34*

– 125 –
convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
section.
J. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of
business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not
held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral comments
received.
K. If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing
by interested parties is received, the Commission may proceed with
promulgation of the proposed Rule without a public hearing.
L. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members,
take final action on the proposed Rule and shall determine the
effective date of the Rule, if any, based on the Rulemaking record
and the full text of the Rule.
M. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
Commission may consider and adopt an emergency Rule without
prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided that
the usual Rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in
this section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of this provision,
an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately in
order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an
administrative Rule that is established by federal law or Rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
N. The Commission or an authorized committee of the
Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule or
amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors
in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public
notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any
person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision
may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
material change to a Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing
and delivered to the chair of the Commission prior to the end of
the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take
effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the
revision may not take effect without the approval of the
Commission.
-
*SB34*

– 126 –
SECTION 11. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION,
AND ENFORCEMENT

A. Oversight
1. The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of State
government in each Member State shall enforce this Compact and
take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the
Compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of this Compact
and the Rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as
statutory law.
2. All courts shall take judicial notice of the Compact and
the Rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a
Member State pertaining to the subject matter of this Compact
which may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of the
Commission.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing to
intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide
service of process to the Commission shall render a judgment or
order void as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated
Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a Member State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities
under this Compact or the promulgated Rules, the Commission
shall:
a. Provide written notice to the defaulting State and
other Member States of the nature of the default, the proposed
means of curing the default and/or any other action to be taken by
the Commission; and
b. Provide remedial training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
2. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the
defaulting State may be terminated from the Compact upon an
affirmative vote of a majority of the Member States, and all rights,
privileges and benefits conferred by this Compact may be
terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the
default does not relieve the offending State of obligations or
liabilities incurred during the period of default.
3. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be
imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have
been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be
given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and
minority leaders of the defaulting State’s legislature, and each of
the Member States.
-
*SB34*

– 127 –
4. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the
effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
beyond the effective date of termination.
5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a
State that is found to be in default or that has been terminated
from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the
Commission and the defaulting State.
6. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the
Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District
of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing member shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
C. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Member State, the Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise
among Member States and between member and non-Member
States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as
appropriate.
D. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
discretion, shall enforce the provisions and Rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal
action in the United States District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices against a Member State in default to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated Rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include
both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded
all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies
of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or State law.

SECTION 12. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR OCCUPATIONAL
THERAPY PRACTICE AND ASSOCIATED RULES,
WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT

A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which
the Compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth Member State.
The provisions, which become effective at that time, shall be
-
*SB34*

– 128 –
limited to the powers granted to the Commission relating to
assembly and the promulgation of Rules. Thereafter, the
Commission shall meet and exercise Rulemaking powers
necessary to the implementation and administration of the
Compact.
B. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the
Commission’s initial adoption of the Rules shall be subject to the
Rules as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law
in that State. Any Rule that has been previously adopted by the
Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day
the Compact becomes law in that State.
C. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by
enacting a statute repealing the same.
1. A Member State’s withdrawal shall not take effect until
six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement
of the withdrawing State’s Occupational Therapy Licensing Board
to comply with the investigative and Adverse Action reporting
requirements of this act prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any Occupational Therapy licensure
agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Member
State and a non-Member State that does not conflict with the
provisions of this Compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No
amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding
upon any Member State until it is enacted into the laws of all
Member States.

SECTION 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate
the purposes thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be
severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this
Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any
Member State or of the United States or the applicability thereof to
any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid,
the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability
thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall
not be affected thereby. If this Compact shall be held contrary to
the constitution of any Member State, the Compact shall remain in
full force and effect as to the remaining Member States and in full
force and effect as to the Member State affected as to all severable
matters.
-
*SB34*

– 129 –
SECTION 14. BINDING EFFECT OF
COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

A. A Licensee providing Occupational Therapy in a Remote
State under the Compact Privilege shall function within the laws
and regulations of the Remote State.
B. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law
of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
C. Any laws in a Member State in conflict with the Compact
are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
D. Any lawful actions of the Commission, including all Rules
and bylaws promulgated by the Commission, are binding upon the
Member States.
E. All agreements between the Commission and the Member
States are binding in accordance with their terms.
F. In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the
constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any Member
State, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict
with the constitutional provision in question in that Member State.
Sec. 27. NRS 640A.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640A.220 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 239.0115 [,] and section 26 of this act, a complaint filed with
the Board, all documents and other information filed with the
complaint and all documents and other information compiled as a
result of an investigation conducted to determine whether to initiate
disciplinary action against a person are confidential, unless the
person submits a written statement to the Board requesting that such
documents and information be made public records.
2. The charging documents filed with the Board to initiate
disciplinary action pursuant to chapter 622A of NRS and all
documents and information considered by the Board when
determining whether to impose discipline are public records.
3. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
any other licensing board or any other agency that is investigating a
person, including, without limitation, a law enforcement agency.
4. The Board shall retain all complaints filed with the Board
for at least 10 years, including, without limitation, any complaints
not acted upon.
Sec. 28. The preliminary chapter of NRS is hereby amended
by adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as otherwise expressly provided in a particular statute
or required by the context:
1. Privilege to practice as a physician assistant in this State
under the PA Licensure Compact ratified and entered into in
-
*SB34*

– 130 –
section 1 of this act shall be deemed to be equivalent to a license as
a physician assistant issued by:
(a) The Board of Medical Examiners pursuant to chapter 630
of NRS if the physician assistant is under the jurisdiction of the
Board of Medical Examiners pursuant to section 5 of this act.
(b) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine pursuant to
chapter 633 of NRS if the physician assistant is under the
jurisdiction of the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine pursuant
to section 15 of this act.
2. Privilege to practice as an audiologist or speech-language
pathologist in this State under the Audiology and Speech-
Language Pathology Interstate Compact ratified and entered into
in section 21 of this act shall be deemed to be equivalent to the
corresponding license.
3. Privilege to practice as a physical therapist or a physical
therapist assistant in this State under the Physical Therapy
Licensure Compact ratified and entered into in section 23 of this
act shall be deemed to be equivalent to the corresponding license.
4. Privilege to practice as an occupational therapist or
occupational therapy assistant in this State under the
Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact ratified and entered
into in section 26 of this act shall be deemed to be equivalent to the
corresponding license.
Sec. 29. NRS 7.095 is hereby amended to read as follows:
7.095 1. An attorney shall not contract for or collect a fee
contingent on the amount of recovery for representing a person
seeking damages in connection with an action for injury or death
against a provider of health care based upon professional negligence
in excess of 35 percent of the amount recovered.
2. The limitations set forth in subsection 1 apply to all forms of
recovery, including, without limitation, settlement, arbitration and
judgment.
3. For the purposes of this section, “recovered” means the net
sum recovered by the plaintiff after deducting any disbursements or
costs incurred in connection with the prosecution or settlement of
the claim. Costs of medical care incurred by the plaintiff and general
and administrative expenses incurred by the office of the attorney
are not deductible disbursements or costs.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Professional negligence” means a negligent act or omission
to act by a provider of health care in the rendering of professional
services, which act or omission is the proximate cause of a personal
injury or wrongful death. The term does not include services that are
outside the scope of services for which the provider of health care is
-
*SB34*

– 131 –
licensed or services for which any restriction has been imposed by
the applicable regulatory board or health care facility.
(b) “Provider of health care” means a physician licensed under
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, dentist, registered nurse, dispensing
optician, optometrist, [registered] licensed physical therapist,
podiatric physician, licensed psychologist, chiropractic physician,
naprapath, doctor of Oriental medicine, holder of a license or a
limited license issued under the provisions of chapter 653 of NRS,
medical laboratory director or technician, licensed dietitian or a
licensed hospital and its employees.
Sec. 30. NRS 41A.017 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41A.017 “Provider of health care” means a physician licensed
pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant, dentist, licensed nurse, dispensing
optician, optometrist, [registered] licensed physical therapist,
podiatric physician, licensed psychologist, chiropractic physician,
naprapath, doctor of Oriental medicine, holder of a license or a
limited license issued under the provisions of chapter 653 of NRS,
medical laboratory director or technician, licensed dietitian or a
licensed hospital, clinic, surgery center, physicians’ professional
corporation or group practice that employs any such person and its
employees.
Sec. 31. NRS 42.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
42.021 1. In an action for injury or death against a provider
of health care based upon professional negligence, if the defendant
so elects, the defendant may introduce evidence of any amount
payable as a benefit to the plaintiff as a result of the injury or death
pursuant to the United States Social Security Act, any state or
federal income disability or worker’s compensation act, any health,
sickness or income-disability insurance, accident insurance that
provides health benefits or income-disability coverage, and any
contract or agreement of any group, organization, partnership or
corporation to provide, pay for or reimburse the cost of medical,
hospital, dental or other health care services. If the defendant elects
to introduce such evidence, the plaintiff may introduce evidence of
any amount that the plaintiff has paid or contributed to secure the
plaintiff’s right to any insurance benefits concerning which the
defendant has introduced evidence.
2. A source of collateral benefits introduced pursuant to
subsection 1 may not:
(a) Recover any amount against the plaintiff; or
(b) Be subrogated to the rights of the plaintiff against a
defendant.
3. In an action for injury or death against a provider of health
care based upon professional negligence, a district court shall, at the
-
*SB34*

– 132 –
request of either party, enter a judgment ordering that money
damages or its equivalent for future damages of the judgment
creditor be paid in whole or in part by periodic payments rather than
by a lump-sum payment if the award equals or exceeds $50,000 in
future damages.
4. In entering a judgment ordering the payment of future
damages by periodic payments pursuant to subsection 3, the court
shall make a specific finding as to the dollar amount of periodic
payments that will compensate the judgment creditor for such future
damages. As a condition to authorizing periodic payments of future
damages, the court shall require a judgment debtor who is not
adequately insured to post security adequate to assure full payment
of such damages awarded by the judgment. Upon termination of
periodic payments of future damages, the court shall order the return
of this security, or so much as remains, to the judgment debtor.
5. A judgment ordering the payment of future damages by
periodic payments entered pursuant to subsection 3 must specify the
recipient or recipients of the payments, the dollar amount of the
payments, the interval between payments, and the number of
payments or the period of time over which payments will be made.
Such payments must only be subject to modification in the event of
the death of the judgment creditor. Money damages awarded for loss
of future earnings must not be reduced or payments terminated by
reason of the death of the judgment creditor, but must be paid to
persons to whom the judgment creditor owed a duty of support, as
provided by law, immediately before the judgment creditor’s death.
In such cases, the court that rendered the original judgment may,
upon petition of any party in interest, modify the judgment to award
and apportion the unpaid future damages in accordance with this
subsection.
6. If the court finds that the judgment debtor has exhibited a
continuing pattern of failing to make the periodic payments as
specified pursuant to subsection 5, the court shall find the judgment
debtor in contempt of court and, in addition to the required periodic
payments, shall order the judgment debtor to pay the judgment
creditor all damages caused by the failure to make such periodic
payments, including, but not limited to, court costs and attorney’s
fees.
7. Following the occurrence or expiration of all obligations
specified in the periodic payment judgment, any obligation of the
judgment debtor to make further payments ceases and any security
given pursuant to subsection 4 reverts to the judgment debtor.
8. As used in this section:
-
*SB34*

– 133 –
(a) “Future damages” includes damages for future medical
treatment, care or custody, loss of future earnings, loss of bodily
function, or future pain and suffering of the judgment creditor.
(b) “Periodic payments” means the payment of money or
delivery of other property to the judgment creditor at regular
intervals.
(c) “Professional negligence” means a negligent act or omission
to act by a provider of health care in the rendering of professional
services, which act or omission is the proximate cause of a personal
injury or wrongful death. The term does not include services that are
outside the scope of services for which the provider of health care is
licensed or services for which any restriction has been imposed by
the applicable regulatory board or health care facility.
(d) “Provider of health care” means a physician licensed under
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, dentist, licensed nurse, dispensing
optician, optometrist, [registered] licensed physical therapist,
podiatric physician, naprapath, licensed psychologist, chiropractic
physician, doctor of Oriental medicine, holder of a license or a
limited license issued under the provisions of chapter 653 of NRS,
medical laboratory director or technician, licensed dietitian or a
licensed hospital and its employees.
Sec. 32. NRS 52.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
52.320 As used in NRS 52.320 to 52.375, inclusive, unless the
context otherwise requires:
1. “Custodian of medical records” means a chiropractic
physician, naprapath, physician, [registered] licensed physical
therapist or licensed nurse who prepares and maintains medical
records, or any employee or agent of such a person or a facility for
convalescent care, medical laboratory or hospital who has care,
custody and control of medical records for such a person or
institution.
2. “Medical records” includes bills, ledgers, statements and
other accounts which show the cost of medical services or care
provided to a patient.
Sec. 33. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
-
*SB34*

– 134 –
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
-
*SB34*

– 135 –
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and sections 1, 10, 21, 23 and 26 of this act, sections 35,
38 and 41 of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of
chapter 391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared
by law to be confidential, all public books and public records of a
governmental entity must be open at all times during office hours to
inspection by any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or
memorandum may be prepared from those public books and public
records. Any such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to
supply the general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the
records or may be used in any other way to the advantage of the
-
*SB34*

– 136 –
governmental entity or of the general public. This section does not
supersede or in any manner affect the federal laws governing
copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in any other manner the
rights of a person in any written book or record which is
copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 34. NRS 372.7285 is hereby amended to read as follows:
372.7285 1. In administering the provisions of NRS 372.325,
the Department shall apply the exemption to the sale of a medical
device to a governmental entity that is exempt pursuant to that
section without regard to whether the person using the medical
-
*SB34*

– 137 –
device or the governmental entity that purchased the device is
deemed to be the holder of title to the device if:
(a) The medical device was ordered or prescribed by a provider
of health care, within his or her scope of practice, for use by the
person to whom it is provided;
(b) The medical device is covered by Medicaid or Medicare; and
(c) The purchase of the medical device is made pursuant to a
contract between the governmental entity that purchases the medical
device and the person who sells the medical device to the
governmental entity.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Medicaid” means the program established pursuant to Title
XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1396 et seq., to
provide assistance for part or all of the cost of medical care rendered
on behalf of indigent persons.
(b) “Medicare” means the program of health insurance for aged
persons and persons with disabilities established pursuant to Title
XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1395 et seq.
(c) “Provider of health care” means a physician or physician
assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 630A or 633 of NRS,
perfusionist, dentist, licensed nurse, dispensing optician,
optometrist, practitioner of respiratory care, [registered] licensed
physical therapist, podiatric physician, licensed psychologist,
licensed audiologist, licensed speech-language pathologist, licensed
hearing aid specialist, licensed marriage and family therapist,
licensed clinical professional counselor, chiropractic physician,
naprapath, licensed dietitian or doctor of Oriental medicine in any
form.
Sec. 35. NRS 374.731 is hereby amended to read as follows:
374.731 1. In administering the provisions of NRS 374.330,
the Department shall apply the exemption to the sale of a medical
device to a governmental entity that is exempt pursuant to that
section without regard to whether the person using the medical
device or the governmental entity that purchased the device is
deemed to be the holder of title to the device if:
(a) The medical device was ordered or prescribed by a provider
of health care, within his or her scope of practice, for use by the
person to whom it is provided;
(b) The medical device is covered by Medicaid or Medicare; and
(c) The purchase of the medical device is made pursuant to a
contract between the governmental entity that purchases the medical
device and the person who sells the medical device to the
governmental entity.
2. As used in this section:
-
*SB34*

– 138 –
(a) “Medicaid” means the program established pursuant to Title
XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1396 et seq., to
provide assistance for part or all of the cost of medical care rendered
on behalf of indigent persons.
(b) “Medicare” means the program of health insurance for aged
persons and persons with disabilities established pursuant to Title
XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1395 et seq.
(c) “Provider of health care” means a physician or physician
assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 630A or 633 of NRS,
perfusionist, dentist, licensed nurse, dispensing optician,
optometrist, practitioner of respiratory care, [registered] licensed
physical therapist, podiatric physician, licensed psychologist,
licensed audiologist, licensed speech-language pathologist, licensed
hearing aid specialist, licensed marriage and family therapist,
licensed clinical professional counselor, chiropractic physician,
naprapath, licensed dietitian or doctor of Oriental medicine in any
form.
Sec. 36. NRS 439A.0195 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
439A.0195 “Practitioner” means a physician licensed under
chapter 630, 630A or 633 of NRS, dentist, licensed nurse,
dispensing optician, optometrist, [registered] licensed physical
therapist, podiatric physician, licensed psychologist, chiropractic
physician, naprapath, doctor of Oriental medicine in any form,
medical laboratory director or technician, pharmacist or other person
whose principal occupation is the provision of services for health.
Sec. 37. NRS 453.371 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453.371 As used in NRS 453.371 to 453.552, inclusive:
1. “Medical intern” means a medical graduate acting as an
assistant in a hospital for the purpose of clinical training.
2. “Pharmacist” means a person who holds a certificate of
registration issued pursuant to NRS 639.127 and is registered with
the Board.
3. “Physician,” “dentist,” “podiatric physician,” “veterinarian”
and “euthanasia technician” mean persons authorized by a license to
practice their respective professions in this State who are registered
with the Board.
4. “Physician assistant” means a person who is registered with
the Board and [:
(a) Holds] holds a license issued pursuant to chapter 630 or 633
of NRS . [630.273; or
(b) Holds a license issued pursuant to NRS 633.433.]
Sec. 38. NRS 454.00958 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
454.00958 “Practitioner” means:
-
*SB34*

– 139 –
1. A physician, dentist, veterinarian or podiatric physician who
holds a valid license to practice his or her profession in this State.
2. A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed or
registered to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or
to administer a dangerous drug in the course of professional practice
in this State.
3. When relating to the prescription of poisons, dangerous
drugs and devices:
(a) An advanced practice registered nurse who holds a certificate
from the State Board of Pharmacy permitting him or her so to
prescribe; or
(b) A physician assistant who [holds a license from the Board of
Medical Examiners] is licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of
NRS and holds a certificate from the State Board of Pharmacy
permitting him or her so to prescribe.
4. An optometrist who is certified to prescribe and administer
pharmaceutical agents pursuant to NRS 636.288 when the
optometrist prescribes or administers dangerous drugs which are
within the scope of his or her certification.
5. A dental hygienist who holds a valid license to practice
dental hygiene in this State and:
(a) Is authorized to prescribe and dispense the dangerous drugs
listed in NRS 631.3105 in accordance with the provisions of that
section and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(b) Holds a certificate issued by the State Board of Pharmacy
pursuant to NRS 639.1374 authorizing him or her to so prescribe.
6. A certified registered nurse anesthetist who orders,
prescribes, possesses or administers poisons, dangerous drugs or
devices in accordance with NRS 632.2397.
7. A pharmacist who is registered pursuant to NRS 639.28079
to prescribe and dispense drugs for medication-assisted treatment.
Sec. 39. NRS 598A.360 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598A.360 “Practitioner” means a physician licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, physician assistant, licensed nurse,
dispensing optician, optometrist, practitioner of respiratory care,
[registered] licensed physical therapist, occupational therapist,
licensed psychologist or perfusionist.
Sec. 40. On or before August 1, 2026, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall:
1. Study the potential impact of:
(a) The PA Licensure Compact ratified and entered into in
section 1 of this act on the availability of services provided by
physician assistants in this State;
-
*SB34*

– 140 –
(b) The Nurse Licensure Compact ratified and entered into in
section 10 of this act on the availability of services provided by
registered nurses and licensed practical nurses in this State;
(c) The Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate
Compact ratified and entered into in section 21 of this act on the
availability of services provided by audiologists and speech-
language pathologists in this State;
(d) The Physical Therapy Licensure Compact ratified and
entered into in section 23 of this act on the availability of services
provided by physical therapists and physical therapist assistants in
this State; and
(e) The Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact ratified and
entered into in section 26 of this act on the availability of services
provided by occupational therapists and occupational therapy
assistants in this State.
2. Submit the report to:
(a) The Patient Protection Commission created by NRS
439.908; and
(b) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and
Human Services, the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Commerce and Labor and the Legislative Committee on Senior
Citizens, Veterans and Adults With Special Needs.
Sec. 41. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB34*